Came here for lunch on a weekday. No wait -- which is awesome! Nice interior, quick service, & good food. Definitely loved the calamari dimsum plate (perfectly tender). They offer both dim sum & "full menu" depending on what you want to do. It's a great place to have a good conversation unlike most dim sum places that are clattering w/ noise. It doesn't look lie they do the carts, but instead you order w/ paper & then they bring your food to you. Definitely recommend it :)
My favorite Chinese restaurant in the area; need to remember to come more often. We were most recently here for my (Chinese) Grandfather-in-Law's 90th birthday dinner. Yes, I'm very happy my kids get those genes, but that's another story. Couple things of note on that meal: 1. Private back room was just right for our party of 25ish 2. The grandparents ordered, so sadly I don't know the names of most dishes. Suffice it to say, there was a wide range and all were quite good 3. Lobster Noodles were memorable; not sure if these need to be ordered in advance 4. Xiao Long Bao & Chicken Potstickers were a hit with the little people... and me They also do Dim Sum well.
Pros: One of the better dim sum places in the day as well as dinner.  The best items on the menu are the Cantonese style dishes (dishes that aren't over-sauced or over dressed). Here's a sample of their best dishes: the Shanghai crab (a misnomer, since it's not the real shanghai crab but a delicious preparation of crab egg omelet), twice cooked ribs (but small in portion!), mushroom dumplings, pea shoot dumplings, durian puff, the crispy fried pumpkin with salted egg. There's also a hidden item that only regulars order - The clear ginseng chicken soup is awesome - be sure to order this soup, if they have it available. The wine list is pretty impressive for a chinese restaurant. Who knew chinese restaurants carried good Napa cabernets. Cocktails are fairly decent too. Con: F'ng Expensive. Don't bring groups here for the regular meals, it's not really worth it unless you go banquet style. Don't fall for the tourist trap menu items like the bisque baked in pastry or Singapore style vermicelli, you're in a Cantonese restaurant - don't order items that aren't typical Cantonese - especially curry. Chinese are NEVER good with curry!!
Overpriced food has gone downhill. The snow buns don't even contain taro anymore, but purple yam instead. The shrimp in all the dim sum dishes were not fresh, left a bad taste in my mouth, but at least didn't make anyone sick. Stick to Koi Palace for dim sum in the bay area. Never coming here again...
Pekin duck is really good!
Almost hate to tell people about the dim sum. I want to be able to just glide in and get a table. Their dim sum is delicious! From the outside it looked small but when you get in it's spacious and nicely decorated. The staff is on it. From the moment we walked in and sat down: greeted, seated, and watered. They give you a menu, a pencil, and an order sheet. You tick off what you want and pretty quickly they serve it. Definitely recommend.
There was probably a time in the restaurant's history when it was a great value, but it isn't today. The food is excellent, but the portions are ridiculously meager. We ordered the Honey Beef with Garlic. It was good, but there were literally about 7 smallish pieces of meat in it. Rice doesn't come with the meal, despite the high prices for the entrees. All in all, great food, but the value doesn't add up.
we did our rehearsal dinner here and everything was awesome!  the service was good.  the food was delicious and everyone kept telling us how great the meal was! we ordered a few of our favorites - chinese cold plate, crab claws, seafood puff pastry soup, veggies, salty egg yolk crab, lobster noodles, fried rice, and mango pudding.  all delcious.  everything came out piping hot.
this location has come a long way since its hong kong flower lounge days when it was dirty.  tai pan... Read more 
This place is very expensive for dimsum and not that great. At least if you are charging more than it has to be at least good food.
After seeing my disappointment with dimsum at another restaurant in Santa Clara, my friend suggested that we should try Taipan. Verdict? Love it :) Deco was lovely, more like restaurants in one of the posh hotels. Don't expect carts moving around as you basically order from the menu and each item is prepared fresh and brought to the table piping hot. Yumz... ordered the normal siu mai, hargow, phoenix claw (hahaha... can't use chicken feet for such high end restaurant review ;p) which would allow me to do the proper comparison with other dimsum places on top of other items. All the 3 ''test' items passed with flying colours. One thing that my friend reminded us of before even going there is that it can be a tad pricey. Well, given the quality and taste, I won't mind paying. It's definitely not a place I would go every weekend, so why not enjoy good quality dimsum once in awhile :) Definitely going back there again to try the rest of the items that caught my eyes I seldom write a review on a place which I have only eaten once/twice but this place, I would like to share with friends/yelpers as soon as possible :D Do try to make reservations as it does get very crowded. Even with reservation, we had to wait for 20mins but that's fine by me
I came, I saw, I conquered. Miss Amber B and I may or may not have indulged in a few (or a lot) of Sunday bubbles.  On empty stomachs.  Hmmm.... Did I mention it was 2:30pm and places were starting to close up? We venture down University and plop down in Tai Pan.  We order enough dim sum to feed a car of clowns.  We may or may not have acted like clowns.  I blame the bubbles. Shumai, shrimp dumpwrings, turnip something, Shanghai dumpwrings (derish), and some other bubble absorbing goodness.  We ate until we were uncomfortably full and took home a doggy bag.  Total damage: ~ $50. We may or may not have washed down our meal with more bubbles.  MOAR BUBBLES!!  Sunday Funday, alright. I will return and conquer again.
Service: 5 Stars, Portions: 2 Stars, Food Quality: 5 Stars Went in for dinner a week or so ago and I must say, the food quality and service were fantastic.  Had the portions been more reasonable (ex: 5 pieces of calamari platter for $10??? Squid is like $3/pound), this would be a five star spot. Clear your schedule for the next day if you have the firecracker chicken.  It's absolutely worth it, but just be prepared.
Good food but unlike some dim sum places, there are no carts. Rather, you check off your food and they bring it out. This is both good and bad. Bad- you can't hand select the dish; good- dishes are very hot and fresh. The food is good but not always to par with "traditional" chinese cooking. I do dislike how the tea is an additional cost. When getting dim sum by myself, the waiter asked if I'd like tea (not explaining an added cost). I received a small pot that cost $2. Eating by myself added up to $20.
Background: I have been here over 30 times and is my go to dim sum joint Pros: -super tasty dim sum that doesn't fail to please -friendly authentic Chinese staff -super fresh food, made to order dim sum -amazing presentation -the tastiest chili -white table clothes that are clean and refreshing to eat on -try the prawns fried in duck yolk, the chicken wings, and the calamari Cons -wish they had roast duck -pricey but well worth it in a nutshell: hands down the BEST dim sum joint I have ever been to
Excellent Peking duck and Shanghi dumplings!
Very minimalist fare.  Definitely a fan of this style of Chinese food.  The buns with duck and lotus were a treat.  The seafood in garlic sauce was delicious and perfectly spiced.  The seafood soup was pretty bland, but there are a lot of soup options that I'll need to continue to try. Service was courteous and timely.
Time wounds all heels. Recent visit showed that service has regressed significantly to the point of being indifferent, even with an empty restaurant it was hard to get our waiter's attention. The food is no longer a knock out as it was earlier, the portion sizes seem very meager. In the meantime Ming's has significantly upped its ante and is a much less expensive alternative. The original friendly host seems to no longer be present, and the new hostess / owner has taken a page out of the ice maident's playbook. Something has been lost here - the warmth of the establishment, perhaps.
Food is first-rate, and service is excellent. Host and hostess are gracious and accommodating,... Read more 
This review is going to be short and sweet.  Everything I ordered was amazing.  Some of the best dim sum and Chinese cuisine I've had in a long time.  I couldn't give a fourth star because the beer selection was a bit lacking (Heineken was the only option) and the prices were a little higher than I would have preferred.
Decent food, but very small portions. Also on the pricy side for common Chinese dishes. I Won't go again.
Went here once, never to return. Cannot believe this place has 4 stars. I agree with most yelpers - service is really bad. And the food fails miserably to make up for the bad service. I cannot believe I am saying this but even PF Changs is better than this place in service and food. Honestly, I have yet to find a decent Chinese food restaurant. Maybe I will not eat Chinese food anymore.
We've long been fans of Taipan and even once considered it as a top choice for a banquet location. Nestled in downtown Palo Alto, Taipan is in the former space that once housed Hong Kong Flower Lounge's Peninsula location.  Due to competition or business reasons, Hong Kong Flower Lounge eventually left, but Taipan took it's place. Since then, we've come for dinner and occasionally for lunch, but at our most recent visit, I'm glad to say that Taipan has steadily improved over the years and I'd say it now easily surpasses the quality of it's former occupant. While the space is smaller than many dim sum restaurants, the wait thus a tad longer (though nowhere near as bad as Hong Kong Saigon and Koi Palace), and the prices slightly higher, Taipan makes up for it with an elegant space that even non-ethnic diners would be comfortable with.  The food though is completely authentic and the clientele is a mix of both seasoned Chinese diners as well as non-Asian Palo Altans. For the dim sum, we ordered an array of dishes and each was prepared wonderfully.  The true key though is that every item is brought to the table individually by order and directly from the kitchen as if they just steamed it for you.  While this results in slightly longer waits, I have to admit that having every item steaming hot made me feel like a king feasting on dim sum like emperors must have done long ago. But temperature alone doesn't make great dim sum.  The shrimp dumplings had large tender shrimp pieces.  The egg tart had a delightfully flakey crust that still tasted delicious though they slightly burnt it.  And the soup dumpling had a rich flavor that tasted as if they had been boiling it for hours on end. While I'd say Fu Lum Mum is a bit quicker and a bit cheaper, there's no doubt in my mind that Taipan has better food.  Dinner, typically a fixed course menu, is similarly tasty though even more expensive.  As for Ming's, the nearby sprawling dim sum place nearby, I would not even put them in the same category as Taipan.  The food here is hot, delicious and elegantly served.  And for that I'm both ok with waiting a tad longer and even paying a bit more. Taipan accepts credit cards, including American Express.
The service is absolutely horrible. The servers never come around and I found myself getting up to fill up my own cup of water while they watched. They brought out the plates one by one so we'd finish the fried rice then get our meat. This was consistent both times I went there. Food is absolutely delicious (especially General Tso's chicken) but definitely on the pricey side considering the portions. Management is scummy. They charged us for tea we didn't ask for and refused to take it off the bill. We also ordered two meats and they only brought out one so we asked for the second one and they tried to charge us for 3 meats. She tried to hold ground that the first plate had double meat, even though it was the same size as the 2nd plate they brought out to us. My suggestion is to get their food to go (if that).
Wow, totally exceeded my expectations. Once you step into this restaurant, it looks expensive (it smells of Chinese money) and so naturally I assumed the food would fall far short (I mean, the best Chinese food is found in hole-in-the-walls in Milpitas or Monterey Park). We had dimsum and it was truly spectacular. You can taste the quality of the ingredients in every bite.  Not overly oily, not overly salty but the meat and seafood was distinguishable and fresh tasting - no mystery ground up pork/shrimp meat here.  The barbeque pork pastry was really delicious as well. Finally an upscale Chinese restaurant with upscale food to match. NOTE: this is not a yoga pants kind of establishment - at lunch it was a very rarified bunch in suits and dress shirts.
I call this chinese lite cuisine, very little seasoning and oils are used, fresh and hot, not very typical chinese.  So if you have a chinese food newbie, especially if they've never tried dim sum before, this is the place to take 'em.  If you're watching your sodium and don't care for the "real deal", this is the place for you.  Even the soy sauce is lite.  I'd have to bring my own in those packets if I were to eat here again. Upscale decor, upscale prices, good for dim sum virgins and those who like moo goo gai pan :-)
Company dinner, and ran out of idea is South Bay. So we picked Palo Alto this time and it's Chinese food in a not-so-Chinese place. Food quality, taste and presentation are good, and wine/mixed drinks selection is average.  The food actually have very Chinese dish like duck, also less-Chinese like the seafood pastry soup. Nice blend and atmosphere. Would recommend to corporate event.
This place is a nice hidden gem in Palo Alto. The interior is quaint and agreeable. It's like you're a guest in the home of a British diplomat in the hills of Hong Kong (or a nice restaurant in IFC). The Crispy Hong Kong noodles are a must try. They have a nice crunchy consistency without an overbearing cheap xo oyster sauce you'd find elsewhere. I was so happy to find a delicious and pleasant dining experience that I literally ate here two nights in a row.
I will not waste any time and just get to the most important...they have the BEST chicken feet I have ever eaten.  I have sampled many many many dim sum chicken feet, as that is my favorite dish.  And hands down, this place makes the best!  It's not over cooked, so the tendons are still a little crunchy, but not undercooked where you taste the fat, and the sauce is perfectly spicy and sweet....oh it is so good, i'm drooling thinking about them! Service is a little slow, as most critics have mentioned.  But it seems like they cook to order, which is pretty unique for dim sum.  Well worth the wait.
Glad we stumbled to this place.   Nice decor and clean were the positives.   Servers were attentive.  Didn't encounter any issue.   The dim sum was decent (good selection), not phenomenal.      Some dishes were pricey considered the small portion size.   We don't mind paying for good food but thought it's not exactly good value because of the portion inconsistency.
Went for Sunday brunch with family and friends.  Had live cockroach crawling on a chair at our table.  Disgusting.  Both I and the other family's dad saw it. Showed the hostess who seated us, who tried to brush it off, instead of catching it.  I told her to take the chair away, which she did, then gave me another chair.  No apologies. Thought about making a big scene, calling the manager, making other patrons aware of what happened, but opted to not ruin other people's meals....  We let our waiter who took our order know what happened.  Again, no acknowledgment, as if no big deal.  Bizarre. Food was good, not sensational, but then, dim sum is dim sum. When settling the check, no apologies again, and no attempt to address our loss of appetite and displeasure at the unsanitary nature of their restaurant. Maybe I need to call the City of Palo Alto, and maybe talk to the newspapers...  These guys are clueless to how disgusting it was for us....
Pros: good ambiance Cons: slow service, pricey, tiny portions I came here with my bf and fam for a pre-birthday celebration.  I made same day reservations on a Sunday night with no issues.  When we arrived, there was a table set aside and we were seated immediately.  We didn't go with a pre-fix menu, but opted to pick our own dishes.  Service was slow, I'm talking snail slow! And with a table of six hungry tummies, it felt like a lifetime. Shrimp papaya salad ($14) - generous amounts of shrimp, refreshing, great starter Hot and sour soup ($12x2) - right amount of sour and spice Egg white fried rice with dry scallop ($16) - light, fluffy, a favorite Honey smoked sea bass ($28) - tiny portion, not worth the price Grilled lamb chops ($28) - four pieces, great marinade, served med rare, not bad Honey beef with garlic ($16) - tiny portion, only about 10 small cubes of meat, good flavor Sweet and sour pork with pineapple ($15) - good Beef chow with chives ($14) - okay Steamed chicken with ginger ($12) - I prefer the Hainan chicken dish at Banana Leaf way better Peking duck with lotus buns ($17, half) - the buns could have been more warmer and fresher Braised tofu with vegetables ($15) - tofu was delicious Overall, the quality and portion of the food is definitely not worth what they charge. Everything was definitely over priced.  If you want good ambiance and pricey food, this place is it.  If you want great HK food that is a bang for your buck, head over to Cooking Papa in Santa Clara.  You won't be disappointed. *Watch out, they charge $2 for each tea pot refill? C'mon.
For Asian cuisine in Palo Alto, this place hits the spot. I was joining a friend's mom for dinner and really enjoyed the service here. Also, a nice place to see random friends - like a few friends dining with their mentors as well as some who looked like Stanford professors... I was there right before Chinese New Year so it was beautifully decorated with a huge vase in the front filled with blossoms. We had the Beef + Chinese broccoli (gai lan) sauteed with fresh garlic, Bei Fong Tong Crab - which was pretty darn amazing (I'm a lazy seafood eater but I actually patiently ate this crab...), and chicken lettuce wraps. Must come back to try their dim sum some day....
3.5 stars. The interior is certainly a notch up the usual Chinese dim sum place, so it's good to bring guests here. Instead of having carts being pushed around, they have a dim sum sheet you order from (which is the norm back in Hong Kong right now anyway), and a convenient photo-included menu for those who are dim sum-illiterates. I must say, the quality of their offerings varies a bit. The staples like Har Gow (shrimp dumplings) and XO-sauce turnip cake are average to below-average, whereas their taro buns are pretty yummy. Also, we went after 12:30pm and some of the items were running out already. The dim sum certainly doesn't beat Koi Palace's *but* is quite a bit less greasy. Maybe the grease has to do with yumminess ;) That said I like this place better than a lot of other places in the South Bay so maybe I'll go here instead when I don't feel like lining up for Koi Palace. It sure is a bit more pricey but you have a lesser chance of slipping on greasy floors or having other people bump into you while you are busy shoving siu mai into your mouth. It's probably worth it.
Except for the swine, all meat served here is cartoon meat.  The beef was unnaturally synthetic, rubbery and resilient, as if it was cut from the thigh of a cartoon cow.  And, like all cartoons--you can clamp them in a bear trap, stab them with scissors, drop pianos and anvils on them and....you just can't kill them.  So what makes you think you could chew them?  Nothing.  You just gotta swallow.  I always assumed the bouncy nature of Chinese food dishes was a reflection of the overall cost of the meal (low priced meat = low priced meal).  But Taipan served the most expensive Chinese food I've had and the meat was awful.  And not just the beef. The chicken was peculiarly chewy, but in a very striated, tough and mysterious way.  Imagine fried chicken bicep or a genetically engineered skirt steak made out of dark and stringy poultry meat, then marinated in shampoo--that's what the firecracker chicken seemed like.  I use "seemed" lightly, because I'm still not sure.  The peppers it was served gave the dish the apperance of being atomically hot, but the two tiny pieces of chicken I had (fear kept me from eating more) rated a solid zero out of ten on the Scoville scale.  The only real thing firecrackery like was the tiny bits of chicken that look like what'd happen if you stuck an M80 into a hen, tossed the whole thing into a fryer and let it explode. The rice was good, as was the service.
*4.5 stars* First and foremost, the restaurant charges for tea.  Customers pay for tea. The dim sum and Hong Kong Style Beef Chow Mein were excellent.  The chow mein was one of the best I ever ate. Service was good.  The restaurant interiors were clean and modern with a touch of high class.  One area looked like a dining room in a home.
a little pricey for chinese food but the place was very nice and the service was pretty good. i had sweet and sour pork and it came nicely in a pineapple shell ;D i'd go back again~
Taipan has been on my "try" list for a while now. This was the evening of back to back press conferences by the President and the Speaker of the house on the debt ceiling. After listening to that depressing bit, I was ready for some good food. Too bad I did not get it at Taipan. I was pretty optimistic after I was greeted by friendly staff in beautiful uniforms. They had chop sticks with gold colored designs on it. Unfortunately the food was just so-so and definitely not worth a 50% premium. The egg foo young was super salty and the chow mein was bleh. The highlight was the mango mousse which was really good. Anyways, don't believe I will go again. If I want higher end Chinese food, I would rather go to Mandarin Gourmet which is not that far away from here.
I think I just found a new favorite Chinese place. Food: 5* Service: 3* On Monday night the bf and I came here for some peking duck, Taipan does not disappoint. The skin was perfectly crispy, the meat was juicy and tender, even the buns were exceptionally soft and fluffy. Even though it's not on the menu, they will let you order half a duck, its the right size for two-three people. We also got the salt and pepper sea bass, tofu with duet mushroom, and rice for two..Needless to say that was wayyy too much food for the two of us, we end up getting the mushroom and rice to go. The sea bass tasted great, fresh, cruchy, with the right amount of flavor. Tofu dish was excellent also, which we had the next day for dinner. Even though we were super stuffed at the end of the meal, bf still wanted to try the mango pudding, I'm sure glad we did though because it was super yummy! There was real mango in the pudding and it came in a champagne glass. So food was excellent, now I can't wait to go back and try the dim sum. Onto the service... Relatively to other Chinese places the service wasn't bad, but wasn't great either. For the up-scaled price I was definitely expecting something more. The servers were not rude, but not friendly either, it just seems like none of the waiters/waitresses know how to smile. Also our water glass was never filled. Like I said I will probably come back again for the food, maybe next time we will have better luck with the waiters.
Taipan is the perfect place to pop someone's dim sum cherry. Authentic (and very good) dim sum restaurants are usually very intimidating for first timers. The crowded and haphazard ambiance often turns away even the more adventurous food lovers who weren't exposed to the Cantonese dim sum culture. If you are not a dim sum novice (and still reading at this point), you are probably thinking Taipan is just one of those overpriced mediocre dim sum restaurants catered to non Chinese clientele. Taipan does have a slightly upscale ambiance (beautiful full bar right at the entrance, tables with clean thick white table cloth and high back cushion chairs), it is really not another Sino in Santana Row (which, by the way, is fusion to the core but serves surprisingly great authentic dim sum). The dim sum here is better than many of the restaurants in the peninsula and south bay, with a few dishes even better than Koi Palace. Their shrimp rice noodle rolls are the best I have had in bay area. Dishes I would recommend: 1) Rice Noodle Rolls - I have only tried the shrimp and the bbq pork variety but judge from the overall quality I think you really can't go wrong with any of the flavors. 2) Fried Meat Paste & Chive Dumpling 3) Snow Buns - Great texture but I wish they make a egg custard version instead of taro paste. 4) Shrimp Dumpling (Har Gow) 5) ShangHai Dumpling (aka XLB) - don't have a lot of soups but the fillings are very flavorful and the skin has a nice texture. I rather have dark vinegar than the red one though. 6) Foiled Chicken with Special Sauce Dishes I would stay away: (I think they tried to make these dishes healthier than the traditional verision? Which ended up strangely unappealing) Sticky Rice in Lotus Leaf - Serious lack of filling. Glorious Rice Puff  - Very bland. Fillings weren't flavorful. Pan Fried Turnip Cake - Not enough turnip. Way too doughy. Also not pan friend to the perfect crispiness. The dim sum menu is very simple. They don't have a lot of varieties but everything is made to order so they are fresh out of the kitchen and piping hot when served. The menu could be better though. They really should have pictures for each individual items so it is easier to reference. The English names of the dishes are not very informative. They take reservation on OpenTable. Price seem quite reasonable for dim sum lunch. (It was $25ish per person and we were all stuffed) It is a place I will return to. I would rank Taipan higher than Fu Lam Mun, Hong Kong Saigon and Zen Peninsula. About half a star down from Koi.
I love Taipan & I've only been here for Dim Sum, so that is all I can comment on...I have been here many many times though with my family. We all love Taipan and are major Dim Sum lovers, so we've tried our fair share in the past.  Taipan is conveniently located near campus and it is clean & nicely decorated.  Its definitely one of the more upscale Dim Sum places I have been to.  The style is a bit different though because you mark your order on a menu sort of like sushi at a Japanese restaurant.  This method is preferably because you definitely get all the dim sum you want, but at the same time you lose the thrill of the chase w/ the cart ladies! :( No matter because Taipan makes up for it with its delicious, hot & fresh dumplings, noodles, etc...just thinking about it now is making me crave dimsum! Service: attentive & helpful Ambiance: upscale & that is reflected in the price, but still reasonable I definitely recommend taipan for dimsum!
Pot stickers the best we've had. Garlic beef with asparagus excellent, as well as walnut prawns, and very good chicken with Canton Kung Pao sauce. A bit pricey, but well worth it. Lemon chicken is greasy and the jade chicken sort of bland on our second try. But General Tso's was very good and fire cracker chicken was a taste sensation.
I've ordered here three times, and each time I get the same thing... I don't know why, but I know it's D.E.L.I.C.I.O.U.S.L.Y.  GOOD!  :) 1)  Peking Duck (4/5) ($32)-- Fresh, crispy skin paired with roasted slices of succulent dark meat hugged by a sweet, steamed Chinese bun (chun bing) with a delicate helping of spring onions, hoisin sauce and thinly sliced cucumbers FOR THE WIN!!!  :)  This is a great dish.  I've eaten the best of the best Peking ducks in Beijing China, and it's definitely one of those specialty dishes that is a crowd pleaser.  Taipan does a good job at serving up Peking Duck, and I haven't been disappointed once. The way the skin of the duck is prepared is key.  At Taipan, the skin is crispy and not soggy.  Yes, it's an oily dish, but they actually try to give you slices of skin that don't have huge pieces of duck fat clinging to the skin.  As for the portion, it would probably serve two or three people. I once went to a restaurant that gave Wonder bread-- BIG mistake.  There is no way you can pull off Beijing kao ya and give wonder bread.  Here, they give you the full experience with steamed, white Chinese buns folded into little half moon buns.  Perfect.  :)  The spring onions are fresh and they're very generous with their cucumber slices.  All in all a solid dish. Shanghai Dumplings (3.5/5) ($8)-- It's not as good as Din Tai Feng, but it's good for Palo Alto.  The Shanghai Dumplings are like mini xiao long baos.  They have soft outer skin, a tiny spoonful of juice inside and fresh, marinated meat inside.  One time the skin was pretty tough, but that's because I saved it for last.  This dish is best eaten right away, even if it's hot.  I like how Taipan pairs this dish with red vinegar and ginger.  That's the way to go! Lychee & Fruit Dessert (2/5) ($6)-- The lychee is canned.  That's a huge disappointment.  :(  The lychee should be fresh if you're going to serve it up with fresh fruit. This, by the way, is dinner for one.  :)  You only live once, right?
Excellent food and service for early Valentines dinner. The food is US chinese style but still tasty and original compared to most PA asian restaurants!
One of the nicest Chinese restaurants I have been to.  They somewhat remind me of Amber, but for Chinese food.  They aren't pretending to be some off fusion concept.  They are Chinese focused, with excellent execution. I think Tamarine overall is still better in the broader 'Asian' category - but both are top notch.
What a lovely restaurant. The ambiance was delightful and the food was amazing. I felt like I was in good hands. Thanks for an enjoyable experience.
****************** UPDATE REVIEW ******************* Took my parents back here for some Dim Sum, my parents were skeptical at first with the tablecloths and quite a few non-Asian diners here. They thought they were having a French cuisine lunch because the place is so nice, clean as a fine dining non-Asian resto. However when the got the first sip of the Chrysanthenum Tea, they both changed their mind! - Meat in Buns with sesame - was crisp outside & soft inside, sweet and nice. - Shanghai Dumplings - was smaller in size, but was good, the ginger aroma after the first bite was so nice & juicy. - Chinese Broccoli with Oyster Sauce. - Ha Cao - shrimp dumplings - good! - Shrimp & Chive Dumpling - good & tasty, my mom likes it more than the regular shrimp dumplings. - Shiu Mai - was moist, tight, and full of flavor. - Sticky rice in lotus leaves - moist, cooked right, and just a great dish; although you will fill up quickly! - Shark Fin Dumpling Soup was fantastic - stuffing with shrimp, scallops, and meat. The broth was sweet, full of aroma; & my parents couldn't stop drinking the soup. They were silent during this dish, didn't even talk to me till the finished the last drop ;-) Tai Pan got us our booth as requested. Service was great as usual. My parents enjoyed the food & they are already looking forward to come back for dinner!
***************** REVIEW 380 ****************** It's a beautiful restaurant for Chinese... Read more 
3.25 stars. The service was ok. However, the food was pretty good. We arrived shortly after 1 and the restaurant wasn't too busy. It took awhile to get someone to pay attention to us so we can start ordering, but once we ordered the food came out one by one. We ordered potstickers, salt and peppered chicken wings and beef chow fun. The portion of the chow fun wasn't that huge, but it was tasty. My least favorite dish was the potstickers. For 2 people we spent about $37 although at a hole in a wall chinese restaurant that would feed an entire family! Cute restaurant and nice that it's right next to a parking lot. I'd come here again to try some other dishes.
On a 1-10 scale, I'd give this place a 7.5. Took my fam here tonight for Thanksgiving. Got there at 6pm and they had just opened at 5:30 so it looked dead. Hostess greeted us immediately and was very courteous. The interior was clean and elegant. The food was pretty good but nothing wildly amazing and at $200 for 5 people, I thought it was a bit excessive. So when we first got there, the staff was super fast and super attentive. By the time we got to dessert, it was 7:30 and it was a bit busier, but it wasn't packed or crazy but somehow, the service just stopped being so good and the guy apologized cause it got "busy" (I mean, more people came but there were still a lot of empty tables so I'm not sure what their definition of busy is). We ordered ONE dessert, just the fried banana and it literally took them 20 min to bring it to us and that was after we asked what was going on. It took them so long that my mom said to me TWICE, maybe we should cancel the dessert and just ask for the check cause she felt they probably forgot about us, which is not what I want my family to feel on our special family night out on Thanksgiving especially when we were spending so much there. So while I was impressed at first, when it got "busy", I found myself getting more and more annoyed about the service. I was just hoping to have a special night on Thanksgiving and get service that would make me feel more special on this holiday because my family and I decided to spend our holiday celebrating here. I don't think they got that at the end... And in the end, I felt like I was at those other average chinese restaurants where it's super loud and busy and the waiters just rush past and ignore you. I think that's unfortunate that I felt that way in this establishment. I'm sure it doesn't happen often here, but just because it was an important night, I think that's why it bugged me even more. And yes, the tea is $10 and it is not worth it. I regret ordering it though it tasted good and strong, we didn't need $10 tea. I think I would have given this place a 4 out of 5 on Yelp if they didn't drop the ball at the end of the night and irritate me cause I was expecting smooth service on Thanksgiving. I posted only a few of the dishes we ordered, but you can get an idea from there...
The food was OK to excellent (see below).  But the service, the unhelpful  staff, and other parts knock it down to two stars. Our party of five adults and one child had dinner at Tai Pan on May 15, 2011.  Our reservation was for 6 pm, and two of our party were unavoidably delayed and were seated at 6:12 pm. I think we put our order in at about 6:20. Food: We had two dim sum plates, the crispy shrimp balls and a sampler plate,both of which which were quite good, especially the crispy shrimp balls.  The sweet corn soup with chicken?  Uninspired at the price. The walnut prawns and the honey beef were excellent and worth the price.  The beef chow fun wasn't any better than at one of the fast-food joints, like J & J's Hawaiian Barbecue.  The mu shu vegetables -- well, the mu shu wrappers were rubbery and the vegetables nothing to write home about. But the deal-breaker, and why I won't recommend this restaurant: The service was terrible. Our table was right next to the kitchen access door.    At least once, a server's cart knocked into the chair of one of our party. We were rushed through our meal.  The two dim sum plates were delivered, and before we had finished, the server brought the soup. At the time,the server started to remove the dim sum plate with items still on the plate.  Before we had finished the soup, the main course dishes were placed.  One dish (steamed rice) was never delivered. We stacked the dim sum plates and the soup cups at the end of the table (remember, we are right next to the kitchen) and it was several minutes before they were removed. We didn't order anythiing from the bar, just having tea and water as beverages.  Despite trying to flag down servers at least three times, our water glasses were not replenished.  Finally, one of our party got up and fetched a water pitcher from the station and refilled our glasses. To make it worse, the server tacked on a mandatory 20% tip.  I'm all in favor of mandatory 18%-20% tips for large parties of 10 or more, but a mandatory 20% tip for a party that is the size of a normal family?  I don't think so. As we walked out (at about 75 minutes after we had placed our order)  I noticed that the bar did not have a server, and there were 20+ dirty glasses stacked on the bar.  If I'd had a 7:30 or 8 pm reservation, that would have sent me right back out the door. I will not be recommending this restaurant.
Yay! I'm a fan of Tai Pan's dim sum. Finally found a decent dim sum place near work. Didn't want anything greasy and something quick. The +'s: + I found the picture menu and checklist helpful in case I didn't understand what I was ordering. + Rice noodle, shau mai, har gow (shrimp dumplings), mushroom dumplings, 1000 layer cake, snow cake (steamed buns with taro mix), string beans, fried taro, and tea all disappeared. No leftovers for two people who left comfortably full. + Nice covered tables and setting. Mostly business crowd lunch here. + Friendly and attentive service. Did not have to wait around long for anything from food to bill. The -'s: - Price. That means $60 before tip for all the food we just ordered as noted above. You can find cheaper dim sum but that'll mean quality and setting will reflect what you pay. Overall I will return for dim sum when I'm feeling for some quality dim sum and don't mind paying a premium.
This is an upscale dim sum and Cantonese restaurant. I only came for the dim sum (twice) and left well-fed, appetite whetted. There wasn't too many bad dishes at all and the quality of the ingredients are fairly good (comparable to my favorite in the Bay Area - Koi Palace). BTW, before they throw down the ban on shark fin soup in 2013, ORDER AS MUCH AS YOU CAN! It was great quality here for about the same price as Koi Palace's offering. It's a pricey place but it likely comes from the location in downtown PA and the decor here. Parking isn't as bad as you'd come to expect from the area as well. Well worth the visit if you're a dim sum snob.
It's easy to find a good Chinese restaurant in the bay, but it's not that easy to find a nice decorated & clean Chinese restaurant that my dad likes to treat his friends to. And Taipan is one. I've tried both of its dim sum and dinner. They're both decent :D The only con: kind of pricey.
I went during dinner and it was relatively empty on a Saturday night at 7pm. I ordered the Sweet Corn Soup with chicken, honey beef, and seafood with sizzling rice. The sweet corn soup had 1 cup for $5 and a bowl for $10.95. When the server brought the soup, he basically gave us two rice sized bowls that were full. Makes me wonder how big families order soup from this restaurant. The honey beef was absolutely delicious although the portions were relatively small. The meat was tender and the honey added in that extra flavor making it perfect. The seafood with sizzling rice was alright, but the extra spiciness from the sauce didn't have good synergy with the rest of the dish. TLDR; The honey beef is the only thing that made me give 4 stars. Everything else was average including the service.
Stopped by with a group for a dim sum lunch. Unlike other Chinese dim sum places, the food was served off the menu, not by a rolling steam cart. The menu was picture driven; you can order what looked nice. The ambiance is really nice, the artwork, the nice tablecloths, even the chopsticks were fancy. The dim sum food was fine, though the price reflects the upscale ambiance....a reflection of the customer base. Parking can be tight and you have to be mindful of the meter maids stalking for their next commission.
Wow, excellent dinner! a bit more expensive that your average Chinese Restaurant... but worth every penny. BTW, PF Changs is not in the same league  lol!! Excellent location, away from the usuall nut jobs of University Avenue. Hong Kong style at it's best!  If you're in the neighborhood, craving Chinese, adjust your budget, belts and stop by Taipan..... 1) Salt and Crispy Calamari 2) Steam Chicken bun in clay pot 3) Crispy Duck 3) Singapore noodles 4) Honey walnut prawns 5) Crispy Honey beef with sugar snap.
Great upscale Chinese restaurant. The food is great, but it's hard to find parking spot and very expansive for lunch.
I went here when I was out in Palo Alto for a conference a couple weeks ago. 2 people, 2 apps,  2 entrees and a side of steamed veggies, no alcohol came to $45 a person. Not expensive, but more than I would have paid in Garden Grove. Chinese food is supposed to be cheap. But OMG the walnut shrimp completely makes up for it. I paid the bill and left a very happy woman. The sauce is made with mayo, and I tried to make it myself at home once and will never try it again, it was not good. Sounds weird but it's oh so good. It's like chinese comfort food (I don't think it's "authentic" chinese). I order honey walnut shrimp whenever its offered on a menu and it doesn't always measure up. But this might have been the best I've ever had. And the candied walnuts are really really good too. Ok, enough about the walnut shrimp. Everything else we had was also very good. I went back a couple days later for the lunch, I cant remember what it's called (when you order a bunch of small plates of different things). Everything we ordered was very good. So I give 2 thumbs up. Normally, I'd give 4 stars for a really good place, but I can't not give the honey walnut shrimp 5 stars. I just have to.
Really nice dining out place. Mango pudding.
Really nice dining out place.
What a disappointment. The food here is no better than China Delight down the street, except that it probably comes faster, the waiter is in goofy Fu Manchu clothes (great, guys, send our whole race back to the 1900s, why don't ya?) It's not that I think the food is inedible, but having paid $15 per dish, my standards were very high. The only truly good thing was the tea. But of course they charged for it - $2 per person. I prefer Hong Kong Flower Lounge which was here before. Less of a chip on their shoulder and no desire to charge out the ass for bog-standard average Chinese food.
After having this restaurant on my list of places to try for almost two years ago, I'm glad to say that the food lives up to the consistently good ratings.  We took a family friend out here for dinner the other day and highlights included the: Roast duck (very tender! several notches above the competition) Mushu pork (great texture and the wraps were perfectly made) E-fu noodles The interior's beautifully laid out and darker than your usual Chinese restaurant.  Funny enough, the restrooms out back were pretty gross especially when you're coming from such a nice dining area.  As for service, I enjoyed the pleasant waitstaff but would've appreciated less sluggishness with the pacing of the dishes.  All in all, a very tasty meal and totally worth a revisit for the dim sum!
Came here for CNY and it was the first time I've tried their dinner menu items. Must get: Veggie egg rolls, Shrimp dumpling soup, tiger prawns, braised tofu w/ mushrooms. I thought the salt/pepper crispy sea bass was good, but my dad said it wasn't as good this time. It was pretty crowded due to CNY. Will probably try other dinner items next time. Still gotta say, my favorite place for dim sum!
In my previous review, I mentioned that there is never a wait to get seated. Went back today (a... Read more 
Big debate, do I give this 5 stars? I decided in the end, 4.5 stars. Easily one of the top 5 restaurants in downtown Palo Alto. - Dim sum is very nice for lunch. Served at a good pace, good options. The calamari on the dim sum menu is a must must must - Desserts = home run. The sesame ball dessert is to die for and incredible when eaten fresh. Mango pudding is great too. - Buddha taro bowls = great food, great presentation. I prefer the seafood one. Very light, very fresh. - Jade basil chicken is excellent, as are the chicken lettuce cups Not everything on the menu is fantastic, but most everything is. The prices are a little on the high side but you get what you pay for --- really high quality, well prepared food that is about as far away from the usual oily heavy Chinese food as you can get. Highly recommend, and a 4.5 star.
The vast majority of reviews here seem to be on dim sum, which is not what I came in here for. Unfortunately, I miscalculated how busy the Tuesday before Christmas would be in downtown Palo Alto, only accounting for the people who were on vacation, instead of accounting for all of the last minute shoppers. So there we were, circling the parking lots and streets, searching for parking for what seemed like forever, when we passed the restaurant we were originally intending to go to for lunch. Osteria was packed to the brim. We found parking shortly after and opted for Taipan instead. One look at the prices and I should have known better than to walk inside. $13-14 a plate??? Given all of the frustration involved with parking though, I just wanted to eat, so I walked in, hoping for the best. The obligatory star I'm giving here is for the tea, which was actually pretty good. I'm not sure it was $2 a person good, but it was better than the tea I usually get. Between the three of us, we got the XO lamb, the walnut prawns, and sauteed vegetables with mushrooms. We expected to get leftovers. We had none. The portions were tiny, not at all what you would expect from those prices. The lamb tasted like beef, and it was definitely the best thing we ordered. You think about that for a second. The walnut prawns were okay, but nothing to write home about. And the sauteed vegetables with mushrooms...geez. If I could make $14 for each plate of that I served up, I'd quit my job and saute mushrooms and vegetables for a living. This was so easy to make and so expensive that I'd consider it highway robbery. All in all, the price came out to $64 total for three people. $20+ a person for mediocre Chinese food when the best dish doesn't taste like they're using the right meat? Highway robbery. When I really think about it, it's obvious what all of that extra money is going to. #1: The waitstaff all wear nice uniforms with intricate designs. #2: The waitstaff speak fluent English. #3: The waitstaff are very attentive to refilling tea and water, and asking how the food is. But I'm still not convinced that huge prices + small portions and all three reasons balance out. I don't think I'll ever come back. Definitely not worth your time.
I am hardly an expert on Chinese food, but I do know crap when I eat it so I'm kind of surprised about some of the bad reviews. I've tried both the dim sum and regular entrees, and all were excellent. I'm really picky about meat and theirs was perfectly fine (chicken, fish, shrimp). I love the veggies in a clay pot (includes varieties of seaweed and lotus root). The food is not drowning in sauce like so many other Chinese restaurants - it has the perfect amount to give it flavor but not bog it down with oil. Our water and tea were compulsively refilled and the waiters are knowledgeable about the food. The atmosphere is casual, but slightly nicer. I would definitely eat here again. It's a good date place when you want something unpretentious but cute. I think the prices are reasonable for the food quality.
I find myself eating at Taipan weekly for Dim Sum. This is a really nice place. White tablecloths, very homey atmosphere, not too rushed or crazy. Generally very quiet, nice place for conversation unlike the typical dim sum restaurant. When I arrive near closing time, the food comes out instantly (literally -- an entire table of food appears in 5 minutes or less, generally). this.food.is.yum. period. Super yum in fact. I find myself driving an hour to take people to eat here. If I had one criticism, it'd be that even though I'm a super regular, and tip well, I got the "eye" from the hostess last time because we were one of the last tables there. We ate fast though, and didn't feel like we should have been rushed. I can overlook that though because this place is sooo good.
I really like this place.  I love the Dim Sum for breakfast and I frequently come here for dinner.  I'm a white guy and I've never been to China.  However, I have been to all the Chinese places in Palo Alto, and this is my favorite.  My favorite dishes (for dinner): salt and pepper trout, shanghai dumplings, sweet and sour pork, lemon chicken, veggie fried rice. Cons: expensive, you have to park a block or two away and walk (oh no!). Usually service here is excellent, but last time I was there we had to wait 25 minutes to get someone to bring us the bill.  Granted, we were in a corner and it was busy, but that was really frustrating.  So 4 stars.
Waiting forever, serving is not good, and additional 18% tips included in the bill. So disappointed
Ok, so this by no means a fair assessment because I had burnt my tongue and couldn't savor the true flavors. BUT from what the DW was tasting, the dim sum was just ok for the price.  Keep in mind, we were there way past noon. But everything is made to order and not rolling out on some cart. Shanghai dumplings or xiao long bao here could be more desirable. The turnip cake was cooked just as we asked. The shu mai was good. Everything was just ok. I suppose what you are really paying for is the ambiance. I must say, if you want to take a person out on a date, this is a nice place. Food - 3 Service - 4 Price - 2 Cleanliness - 5 Will come back for a better review.
Mmmmm...the best of both worlds: American style service with Chinese style food. Y and I came for a weekday dinner and were pleasantly surprised by the elegant setting (Asian style decor, very clean and spacious) and the friendly waiters. Even their soy sauce container was awesome: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Menus are also in English, for those who suck at reading Chinese or altogether don't know now. We settled on an appetizer and two dishes. The waiters, dressed Asian style to match the setting, did not wince when we ordered food in English...or water in Chinese... 1. Appetizer - Peking duck: This dish was kinda small, two buns, filled with duck served with two slices of cucumber. ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ) Tasty, but I would say that Great China's duck is better--the wrappers are thin and allow the flavor of the duck to fully come through. 2. Clay Pot Eggplant with Sea Bass: Mmmm you can't go wrong with eggplant, in my book! Yummy, nicely portioned. On the oily side though. ( http://static.px.yelp.co... ) 3. Egg White and Dried Scallop Fried Rice: If you haven't tried this stuff you HAVE TO. I used to order this at one of my favorite restaurants, until it closed down, but Taipan does it right. This is a flavorful yet light fried rice with an exquisite texture ( http://static.px.yelp.co... ). Skipped dessert because we wanted to hit up Culture Organic Frozen Yogurt, but I'm hoping to come back for dimsum at lunch and maybe some mango pudding! Taipan isn't cheap, but you get what you pay for.
I went here last week for the first time with a couple of friends, and really enjoyed this restaurant. I had not heard of Taipan before, but it was mentioned by one of my friends when we were trying to decide on a place to eat, and I'm glad we decided to go here. First off, I was immediately greeted by one of the owners when I walked through the doors (I was the first to arrive), and he was very friendly as he seated me at our table. Talk about great first impressions! When my friends arrived we proceeded to order five things from the menu. For appetizers we had the sauteed minced chicken in lettuce cups and the crispy salt and pepper calamari tidbits, both of which were quite tasty. For our main course we shared the jade basil chicken, Mongolian beef with fried vermicelli and the chow fun with prawns and egg, and all three of these dishes were excellent. When we decided to add white rice to our order the owner requested the rice be brought immediately to our table in a playful manner, stopping short of saying 'We need white rice here, stat!' The decor was nice, the staff (and owners, as mentioned above) were awesome and the prices were fair. They also have a good wine selection (as far as I could tell) and the pours were decent. If you're looking for a low-key, off-the-beaten-path restaurant in Palo Alto that serves up great food, Taipan's your place!
This place is a beautiful, upscale Cantonese banquet restaurant.  You won't embarrass your great-uncle from Hong Kong if you take him here for shark's fin soup and abalone.  It's really pricey for Chinese, like Ming's--because they use the best ingredients and have a very skilled kitchen.  Don't come alone, and bring a friend who knows Chinese banquet food so you don't spend money on a $28 dish that you're unsure about. Nobody makes fish like the Cantonese.  I recommend any dish with sea bass--unlike the sauce-rubbed filets at your trattoria or brasserie, Cantonese sea bass slides off your fork in glistening flakes that melt in your mouth.  The sauteed minced chicken in lettuce cups come steaming off the wok onto your table, and the Peking duck is classic in slices of with crackly skin and juicy breast.
After a great Red Mango Froyo UYE coordinated by Randy in Palo Alto at 5:30....Still hungry...Eli, Bobby, DoTheBob and I decided to hit up a restaurant within walking distance. We saw a restaurant that none of us had ever been to, an upscaly a Hong Kong style Chinese restaurant just off University on Waverly called Taipan, we decided to give it a try. The entranceway is large and clean with windows looking into the main waiting area/bar area.  The rear section is much larger and split into two.  I'd guess it seats around 150, maybe more.  The space is very open and clean, and there are smaller rooms at the back for private parties.  The decor is very clean, definitely has all the signs of being upscale, though it was understated, not extravagant like you'd see in some Chinese restaurants.  All in all, a nice clean modern feel to the place. Here's what we had (some comments are stolen from the other guys) - Appetizer:  Crispy Salt and Pepper Calamari Tidbits $9 for 7 pieces plus light noodles 3 stars Delish! Light tasting and lightly battered, with a sweet sauce on the side.  It was soft and chewy.  It definitely needed that additional flavoring.  There was some salt in it but so little as to be barely noticeable.  If light is what you want, this dish is a good one. - Appetizer:  Twice Cooked Baby Honey Spare Ribs $8 for 6 pieces 5 stars Nice.  Tiny but meaty ribs cooked in a sweet sauce.  This slide-off-the-bone treat was soft and tender, practically melting in your mouth.  The sugars in the honey caramelized the outside perfectly.  I would pay dearly to learn how to make ribs this perfect.  The sauce was not too sweet, and not too gooey, nice and glistening, and they also added dried seaweed flakes.  Definitely recommend this one. - Main Dish:  Ox Tail in Clay Pot Pinot Noir $14 for several pieces (maybe 8 or 9) plus carrots 2 stars I've never had ox tail anything, so this was exciting.  My initial thoughts were that it was a tad more chewy and more gamey than they should of been.  It was a stew style with large chunks of carrots as well.  The flavor wasn't as salty as expected when seeing the dish.  It was good.  But the chewiness was almost rubbery so I'll have to try it somewhere else for comparison. -Veggie Dish:  Tender Pea-shoots with Garlic $16 2 stars Looks a lot like a cross between spinach and bok choy....Other than that, it's sauteed and eaten with a thick sauce (like oyster sauce).  Good, but typical. - Main Dish:  Tiger Prawn in Special Soy Sauce $18 for 10 pieces or so 3 stars Yumm.  Nicely cooked, and nicely flavored.  They were sauteed, and the sauce tasted great, went great with the extra lettuce too.  Loved it....at first.  After a few pieces though, the oil did start getting to me.  You don't notice it at first, even if you're not hungry.  But I'd say three or four pieces is just perfect, any more and it the oil starts to stand out a little. - Soup:  Abalone Fish Maw Shark's Fin Soup $14 per serving (one person....) 3 stars This is only my second time eating shark's fin soup.  And I gotta say, this was pretty good.  There was finely sliced abalone and sharks' fin in a slightly thick clear soup, and I thought this was nicely done.  Of course, what do I know, since I've only eaten it once before...The red vinegar added some great flavoring. - Rice:  Fried Rice with Egg White and Diced Scallops $12 (feeds a few, more voluminous than expected, still not all that) 3 stars Most of the guys thought the fried rice was a little too bland.  True, but on the plus side, it wasn't too oily, making eating a breeze.  Adding just a little something (salt? soy sauce?) would help bring up the flavor without killing the entire taste.  Either way, it's definitely for the sensitive palate connoisseur, and not for the "dang, I love all food" grub eater like me (^-^) - Side Dish:  Beef and Enoki Mushroom Roll $9 for four rolls 2 stars Long thin enoki wrapped in thinly sliced beef in a thick starchy sauce....sounds good right?  But I've grown up eating this a different way:  Add a little soy sauce added while sauteing it up lightly without any other flavoring.  To my biased view, this thick sauced dish is just not right. All in all, Taipain is a fine restaurant for a large group looking to have dinner in Palo Alto, close to university where the action is, but just off enough to feel secluded. Not bad, not bad at all. No matter how bad or good the food, ultimately the big question for a restaurant as easy to get to as this is, would I come back?  If the answer is "sure, why not?" then it deserves at least a three.  And if the answer is "if a group is going, I'd go, but I'd never choose to go" then it's usually a two for me. I'm sorry to say that for me, at least, this nice posh restaurant will not likely be on my "first choice" list of restaurants to go to.  So two it is.
Good quality dim sum.  The atmosphere here is relaxing, unlike a lot of the dim sum places.  As other reviewers mentioned, this place is pricey (~ 2x more than Fu Lum Mum in mountain view). Service was ok and not too pushy.
I'm usually hesitant to invite my parents over to Palo Alto for dinner, because I know the Chinese food here sucks. We used to call Palo Alto the "Windy's Zone" back in the day. However, I've walked by Tai Pan a number of times. Given the favorable reviews here, I thought we should give it a shot. Since this place is more upscale Chinese, the atmosphere was actually quiet. It was easy for my sister and I to have a pleasant conversation. I was still recovering from last night's festivities, so the darker lighting made me sleepy. We started out with the seafood Chowder.  Since we ordered in Chinese, I was just expecting a typical seafood soup.  However, the chowder came in a clay pot covered with flaky breading.  I found it quite tasty, but it filled me up for the rest of the meal. Then out came the Peking Duck, and it seemed like they gave us the perfect ratio of meat, bread, and other accessories. We also ordered some Chinese Broccoli (gailan), some crab, and some tofu. I've gotta say that all of it was pretty good. Overall, I think the food here is pricy and good, but nothing blew me away. I feel like if I spend $110 for 4 people, we should walk away much more satisfied.
We came here for lunch because we were in the downtown area of Palo Alto for a visit!  After looking around, we decided to try this place for dim sum! After entering, we were immediately seat on the most fanciest table I have been at in a long time.  I guess I am used to much simpler dim sum restaurants. Instead of the usual carts with food being wheeled around the restaurant, we were given a sheet of paper to choose our dishes.  I though it was fine since we were in a fancy restaurant.  However, I was  disappointed with the wait time for the food to arrive - it took a long time and my son was hungry. When the food did arrive, it tasted fine and was hot.  I guess they made the food after it was ordered - something I was not used to. After eating, they promptly refilled our tea pot and asked if there was something else they could provide us. Overall, a change from the usual dim sum restaurant but the price was reflective of the level of service and atmosphere!
This place is getting out of control. $12 for vegetable chow fun now? Really? And what happened to the chow fun anyway? I've forgiven the absence of tofu (commonly used  in other restaurants to substitute meat because they have the courtesy to replace the protein) in the past but that  now you've reduced the essence of the dish down to only: a)  celery -- a veggie that I hate the most; b) broccoli -- a veggie that tastes like fart when overcooked, it's becoming obvious that you are intentionally short-changing us vegetarians/vegans. I'm staging a boycott.
Pricey but the best Chinese food in downtown Palo Alto. Well, that probably doesn't say much but... Read more 
dang, this restaurant is good. I was treated to dinner here by family friends, who I think are friends with owners of the restaurant. It's quieter than most other Chinese restaurants, probably because it's a bit more upscale. Our table had 13 people, and we got a large variety of dishes. We got so many dishes that I'll only write about the most memorable ones: The seafood bisque: wowww, this was really cool and very tasty. It came out in a bunch of individual clay pot bowls covered by a crust that was baked on top. It kept the soup hot since the heat couldn't escape the bowl. The soup had a clam chowder kind of flavor, but wasn't too heavy in the creamy flavor. Nonetheless, it was extremely filling. Chicken with ginger on the side: it was good. Enough said. Spare ribs: DROOL, these were so good. The sweet and sticky sauce gave the meat a beautiful shiny, dark brown color, and the meat just slid off the bone and melted in my mouth. Sea bass: cooked perfectly, and completely deboned. The flavor on the skin was kind of weird, but I loved the fact that there were no bones Mango pudding: Made with fresh mango I would say their fried rice (at least the one with egg and shrimp) and noodle dishes (at least the plain chow mein) aren't worth getting. They didn't differ that much from most other restaurants, and other restaurants would be cheaper. Nonetheless, after trying a little bit of everything (I think we had 10 dishes all together), I had no qualms about anything. All the flavors were authentic, but I like the fact that the restaurant added a little bit of innovation. I can't give 5 stars though since service was really slow with refilling water and tea.
I've never heard of this place until a friend who works in Palo Alto downtown mentioned this to me....so I rallied up some friends to go for dim sum lunch. We love the interior setting and decor, very tasteful and really spacey. Wasn't too crowded for lunch time but they do take reservations via opentable or via phone. There were only limited number of dim sum dishes (you order through the menu and not the typical push cart system) but they have a wide variety of lunch dishes/items on the menu. We ordered the following: - Radish cake - good texture, soft and tasty - Har gow/shrimp dumpling - not desirable, the skin was too thick! - Siu mai - pork and shrimp dumpling - meaty, pretty tasty - Rice wrapped in lotus leaf - not enough meat or filling...just too much rice And we supplemented with two noodle dishes: Singapore fried vermicelli and Pan fried seafood noodles HK style. Both the noodle dishes were good sized portion for party of four and tasty. As we were enjoying our meal, we noticed a cart full of this little pots of soup being carted out, they looked like French onion soup with the pastry top and we were very curious! So we asked the server and she told us that it was the seafood bisque with pastry topping. We were very intrigued and ordered one to share. It takes 10-15 mins to be ready. The long awaited soup came and we shared it amongst us 4. It was creamy, kinda like clam chowder texture but filled with shrimp, scallops and cut up pieces of snow peas. It was good. We also noticed other tables ordering the claypot of eggplant and scallop which smelt really good! Next time perhaps. Big brother treated us to a nice lunch...thanks kor kor.
I only had dimsum there once, food was okay. Expensive place. Nicely decorated. Service was okay. Not worth the higher price though. Need to revise this after I've tried their dinner dishes.
relative expensive, but totally worth it... good environment and good food, all my friends comment this place as the best chinese restaurant so far.
Price is a bit expensive, but I suppose you pay for the atmosphere. Food is good, but nothing special.
Superb Chinese cuisine. Wonderful atmosphere of luxuriousness and pleasant atmosphere. Great Hong Kong type food. Loved every minute in this grand restaurant.  Was graciously greeted by the owner. Great wine list.  Appetizers tried were pot stickers, crispy scallops and calamari, and vegetable spring rolls. Main entrees chosen were kung pao chicken, green beans, smoked sea bass, tender beef, seafood mix and a special spicy dish of pork. Every taste was scrumptious.  The service was impeccable. I really loved this restaurant and its setting.  Highly recommended.
much better than expected.  very nice private dining room. had shrimp stuffed crab claw, soup with bread covering, greens and mushrooms, pepper beef, peking duck, ginger onion lobster, steamed scallion soy fish, fried rice, warm black sesame mochi.  for this area, everything tasted good.
This is one of the few Hong Kong style Chinese restaurants that is really worth a try in Palo Alto. As you walk in, marble floor and an impressive backlit marble slab welcome you and you cannot help but notice them both. The dining area is carpeted, not something very common in the Bay Area, over all I loved the decor, they have some Beautiful Japanese paintings and Chinese ceramics. The food menu is abundant and has options for everyone. I tried the Sea Bass here, it has a smoky flavor which was kind of lightly sweet and I enjoyed the baby corn and snap peas with the Sea Bass. The chicken was really good as well, it was in a lemon sauce. I was not too happy with the wine list but they did have some fairly good options. My favorite part of the night was the Mango Pudding, which was soaked in coconut milk, I think it was a great combination and I loved the delicate dessert.
Long overdue review since my wedding banquet here over a year ago! My SO and I were could not decide on one place over another for our wedding banquet. When we finally stopped at Taipan, both of us loved the food, decor, and finally came to an agreement. This used to be the Hong Kong Flower Lounge before they closed down. We love the owners here, Jeannie and her husband, were a delight to work with. Jeannie's husband designed the place, including the awesome fully loaded bar. They gave us ideas for place settings, flower designs, and many other wedding details. The layout was a bit odd for a banquet since a couple of columns were in the way, but we made it work. This was the perfect place for our wedding since we got the whole restaurant to ourselves for about 100 people. The food is excellent, one of the most authentic chinese restaurants around the peninsula. Every dish was well-prepared and the mango pudding dessert is the best I've had in the bay area! Although, the bulk of unexpected expenses came from the open bar, we were happy with the service, the quality of food, and modern decor setting for our celebration. If you are looking to try some place new other than Ming's, you won't regret coming here!
Had lunch here today with a friend, and it was pretty decent! We ordered a bunch of the dim sum dishes, (they do a good job on the pan-fried radish cakes and XO sauce fried rice noodles) , and it all tasted very HK, which isn't something I can say about most of the dim sum places I've been to in the US. Service was awesome, someone came round every couple of minutes to refill your tea and take away empty plates. All the servers were really friendly. The 3 stars is because it wasn't spectacular for the price of the meal. We ordered 4 dim sum dishes and a pan-fried noodle and it came to $50 with tip. (For example, 4 siu mai cost $4, that is ONE DOLLAR EACH!!) The fob in me knows that for that much I'd be able to order twice the amount in any other dim sum restaurant! Also sadly, my Shanghainese dumplings were kinda dry :(
We went for dim sum lunch on a Sunday afternoon around 1pm with four of us. My group has had much experience in different dim sum restaurants in various cities.  For a Zagat and Yelp top rated restaurant, service was terrible! Let me explain.  First, when I first entered the restaurant , nobody greeted me nor asked for the number in my party.  Several employees passed me by without acknowledging my presence; still nobody greeted me. It wasn't that crowded and there were empty tables available!  Only after waiting about 20 minutes were we finally seated.  After being seated, nobody came by the table to take our dim sum order for another 10 minutes.  We had to also ask three times for some water. When the food finally came, the food was tasty but the portions were small for the price that you're paying for.  We were still hungry and decided to ask for the main menu to perhaps order some main dishes.  However, again we were ignored several times for this request.  We decided to give up that idea! When I first entered the restaurant, I even had the idea of reserving a table for a birthday dinner next week based on the interesting choices on the menu. Well, after this experience, I don't think I would be willing to try it again!  If it wasn't the fact that the food was tasty, this restaurant would have received one star.
This place has left me confused and doubting the Yelp rating and doubting my own experience there.  I've decided to write about my experience with the understanding that I may go again and may come away with a different impression if I were to order different dishes. We came her to surreptitiously check it out as a possibility for a wedding banquet.  The place is definitely the most up-scale Chinese restaurant I've ever been to, feeling more like a cross between Chinese and a fancy French restaurant.  The inside is quiet and tastefully decorated.  The service is prompt and efficient and there were plenty of menu choices. We had chrysanthemum tea which was tasty.  We ordered chicken lettuce cups as an appetizer while pouring over the menu.  They were decent and mildly spicy but not spectacular (how would lettuce cups be blow-me-away-amazing though?). For main dishes we had a seafood taro nest dish and a braised beancurd and mushroom dish.  The tofu was tasty as well as the mushrooms accompanying it, but the dish was served warm whereas I know it would have been better served hot.   The taro nest was delicate and interesting to look at but the mix of veggies and seafood was fairly bland.  They did do a careful job of cutting the carrot slices into beautiful leaves and other interesting shapes so you know someone in the back is taking care in the preparation of the food. As for the banquet idea, it's a nice setting that could fit a hundred people or so and they have a nice bar area in the front, but the corkage fee of $15 a bottle took Taipan out of the running, no matter how spectacular the food might have been.
My parents took me here tonite for dinner and I really enjoyed it! We were immediately greeted by the owner with a big smile and hello. For those of you familiar with the downtown PA restaurants, then you'll know that Taipan is located in the old HK Flower Lounge on Waverley. Although it's another Chinese restaurant, the food and decor is definitely not the same -- Taipan is much better! I highly recommend the hainan chicken dish and the braised tofu with mushrooms. Also try the fresh lobster and sauteed pea sprouts with garlic. Oh and let's not forget dessert. Definitely order the mango pudding. It's served in a champagne glass and topped with condensed milk. YUM! My dad tried the creme brulee which looked good too. I definitely want to go back and try some other dishes...
Although it is on the pricey side, Taipan has some of the best Chinese food you can get south of Koi Palace. They have very unique dishes that are very imaginative and mixes in different cultures as displayed by their puff pastry seafood soup. They also offer traditional Chinese plates that include fresh seafood and vegetables. My mom approves and she is a picky eater especially when it comes to Chinese so this place is legit. Another plus is that the atmosphere is not loud and rowdy with Chinese accents flying from table to table and the restaurant is very clean and comfortable making the experience more refined compared to the usual Chinese dine-out.
This is quite an unexpected chinese treasure! My bf and I happen to be in the area, walking around at the farmer's market and we saw Taipan restaurant. I said that oh it's here, I've always wanted to try it. So we walked in, not sure if they were opened or if they needed reservations. The hostess were glad to sit us. It's a much bigger restaurant than it looked from the outside. The decor was beautiful and I love all the details from the furniture to the chopsticks holder on the table. Yes the food was a little pricier but not over the hill expensive. I am happy to pay a little more for quality food and boy, they were yummie! So far, they had the best "siew loong pau" (mini steam buns with soup inside) I've had outside of Asia. We will be back for sure!!!  =) And parking was easy, we got a spot right in front of the restaurant!!
I was told that Tai Pan means "shining above the rest", and this restaurant does exactly that.  I have enjoyed meals in countless Chinese restaurants around the world- especially those that serve Hong Kong/Cantonese cuisine- and can tell you that Tai Pan is one of the finest. Before I discuss the food, two things make this restaurant superior to so many others.  Service and Decor.  It is common to find great Chinese restaurants with delicious and authentic dishes served in ugly, sometimes dirty settings.  Tai Pan is an exception.  The restaurant is extremely well-kept.  It is clean and aesthetically pleasing.  The decor is a neat yet very comfortable.  And as for the service- the waiters and waitresses are all pleasant and helpful with questions.  The owners are also extremely friendly, frequently visiting tables to make sure everyone is happy.  You get a good sense of welcome which is not too common in Chinese restaurants. And now on to the food.  I have dined here several times, and each experience has been memorable.  They have an EXCELLENT shark's fin and abalone prix-fixe menu for something like $38.  You get a minced chicken lettuce cup, sharks fin soup with crab, a whole braised abalone, and your choice of en entree (the half peking duck is great).  Dessert is also included as well.  The brown sauce for the abalone is delicately seasoned and perfect with the tender shellfish. The shark's fin soup is good, but not the greatest I've had.  However, I have not tried all of their varieties of sharks fin soup (usu. varying in the quality of the broth used and the amount of sharks fin).  The corn soup is delicious, as is the "Sea Jewels" seafood bisque which served "en croute" (baked in pastry).  Not too Chinese, kind of French, but very good! The Peking Duck is actually a rather nice preparation.  The skin is perfectly crispy, and served with the requisite steamed buns with hoisin sauce and scallions.  The meat is always perfectly seasoned and very tender.  Another poultry dish I can recommend is the Clay-Pot Chicken.  If you can, ask for it with the bones for better flavor.  (They will prepare it with chicken breast if you prefer, though).  It is cooked in a clay-pot (obviously) with black mushrooms and lop cheong (Chinese sausage) and a rich brown sauce with ginger and garlic.  It is the ultimate Chinese comfort-food served with steamed rice.  Other clay-pot dishes looked awesome too (I frequently spy on other tables to see what my neighbors are eating.) The restaurant serves whole live fish, live shrimp (when available), and whole crabs in a variety of ways.  The Shanghai Crab is outstanding.  The flavors are clear and bold, yet compliment the natural sweetness of the crab wonderfully.  The "flounder with two-tastes" is great as well.  You get the spine/bones of the fish fried until light and crispy.  Its like those Asian fish crackers, but better.  If you like the fried heads of shrimp when you order ama-ebi sushi, you'll love the fried fish bones!  The pieces of the tender fish filets are gently sauted with vegetables. Vegetable and tofu dishes are awesome here as well.  You must try the pea shoots in superior broth.  It comes with fine strips of Chinese cured Yunan ham (something like Smithfield Virginia Ham) and roasted garlic.  The steamed tofu with seafood is also outstanding.  It is very delicate, and wonderful with their homemade organic soy sauce and chili sauce.   The eggplant in a clay pot is great too. Do not pass up dessert here.  The Mango pudding is amazing.  Very intense mango flavor in a smooth and creamy pudding.  It comes with a bit of cream on top also.  Also noteworthy is their well-stocked bar.  They have a big list of specialty cocktails.  One fun feature is that they have a cocktail matched up with your Chinese zodiac symbol. Come often and try something new each visit.  If you ever need suggestions, ask the owners- they have great recommendations.
I came here for dinner around 6PM so a bit on the early side. The place started to fill up as I was finishing up dinner. The owner actually came by and asked how I was doing. She was very nice and I always appreciate that. It's a bit expensive for Chinese food but the food is good and the decor is nice. Memorable items on the menu were the Twice Cooked Honey Spare Ribs (App) and the Stir Fried Beef w/ Garlic in Honey Sauce. Parking is super convenient at the lot adjacent to the restaurant.
I tried the honey smoked seabass (See my photos).  It's excellent; it's really moist and juicy. The mango pudding was good: it's very light and delicate, but not quite as good as the hype.
i know it got 4 stars on yelp, but it's a 'fancy chinese place' and when we sat down, they gave us square plates... the authenticity of this place's food was questioned... but i stand corrected. the hong kong style fried noodles with peppered beef leaves you wanting for more. the garlic pea sprouts is light and flavorful (and not greasy!), the flounder two taste was delictable (not fishy at all)... we ended with egg custard buns steamed for dessert which was fresh and made a satisfying ending because it was just sweet enough to end your craving for savory food but not overly sweet. one of the best cantonese food in the valley for sure. it's pricy but you do get what you pay for.  great ambiance, it's a treat to go there..
Chinese food with class! This is one of the fancier Chinese restaurants in the bay area. The prices are on average 25-40% higher than a typical Chinese restaurant but the service and ambiance is 100% better. It was a very quiet establishment...it was nice to be able to hear everyone without yelling across the table. We scoped this place out as a potential location for a party we were planning... but they were limited in the number of tables available and even if you booked the whole restaurants several tables would be in a few of their back rooms..not quite the openness you want for a large party.
My husband and I walked into this place as an accident but I was pleasantly surprised!  Hidden half a block from University was this great little modern chinese place!  We ordered dim sum and it reminded me of the upscale dim sum you eat in Hong Kong restaurants! The lettuce cups were amazing, the siu mai's were fresh and tasty, the sticky rice in lotus leaf seemed like they made it in house.  Everything was good.  I especially loved the flash fried green beans with minced pork!  Service is a little slow but I think it's because it's a nice restaurant and they want people to relax while eating dim sum. The decor is lovely and serene and the waitresses are pleasant. I would definitely come back to enjoy more dishes. Warning, this place is definitely more pricey than other dim sum places but we'll worth the try!
I am pretty close to saying that I'd come back here for more dim sum, but it is pricey and some of the dishes are off. :( I really liked the shrimp dumplings, shu mai and egg tarts. The remaining  lotus leaf wrapped sticky rice, calamari, spare ribs, shark fin dumpling, fried tofu with shrimp paste, and "little dragon buns" were a bit off - either too bland or too white-washed in flavor. The shrimp dumplings had a tiny film of grease/oil on it to make it look prettier (like prepping food for a photo shoot) and it taste very slightly of sesame oil but there was no fishy flavor in the shrimp that I usually find at dim sum places. Secondly, the shu mai had a lovely, strong mushroom flavor that was awesome and it was juicy and tender throughout. Last but not least, the egg tart was the flaky crust and despite cooling, it remained crispy and not overly greasy. The egg custard was a beautiful canary yellow and just the right balance of sweetness and eggy fragrance. :) I ate all three by myself. I wasn't sure if I should've been amused that the waiters were wearing silky jackets, but it was a little cliche. The lady at the front wasn't very friendly though. We were waiting for 10 minutes while waiting to be seated but she never mentioned to us that we were waiting and totally made us feel like she was ignoring us. Pricey though,  but it is on the University Ave Palo Alto area.
Came here for dinner, as my mom had medical visits at Stanford Hospital.  We are Chinese and the noodle dish with egg and shrimp was delicious, the bird's nest (taro) with seafood was just OK. The bird's nest was not what it should be - it wound up being this flimsy, not great tasting shell, not a crispy fried taro shell. The ambiance was great, the service was OK, they didnt go out of their way to meet our needs. The next night we had take out, and ordered the same noodle dish with egg and shrimp - but the number of  shrimps miraculously dwindled. This was not the same dish we ordered the night before! We were disappointed. Also, they didnt include any silverware or chopsticks for takeout. I think the food is on the pricey side for portions, but they do have some tasty dishes.
What's all the fuss about?  We came here on strong reviews and recommendations recently but left scratching our heads, hungry, and light in the wallet for what we got. Our service was standoffish, mistake-prone, and unwelcoming.  No warm greeting when we came in, no thanks when we got up to leave, we walked by two managers when we left who said nothing to us. Our first appetizer was taken to another table, who turned it away.  It was taken in the back, and reappeared at our table 15 minutes later, cold and forlorn.  I am certain it was the same dish. Overall our food was meagerly portioned and very underwhelming. We did not come for dim sum but for dinner.  Our pot stickers were doughy and bland, the Cantonese noodle dish seemed underseasoned, and another dish seemed almost like half a portion given the price, and was nothing special in terms of freshness, flavor, or originality. No reason for us to come back and give it another try.
To celebrate the end of my final exam week, I decided to splurge and go someplace nice after a week of not eating properly. Taipan's decor is wonderful.  Definitely on par with some of the really fancy restaurants overseas and probably the nicest Chinese restaurant I've ever been to in America.  Of course, the prices reflect the upgrade in decor- but that's not the point.  Since i was tired of thinking and being choosy over the menu, we decided to go for the prix fixe 5 course menu, which had everything from appetizer, soup, entree, and dessert (lobster included within the meal). So, with an open heart and an empty stomach, we dug in, and it was DELICIOUS.  While some of their offerings were basically prettier versions of some standard staples [MINCED CHICKEN IN LETTUCE CUPS, ANYONE?], overall, the meal itself was really satisfying. Take the guesswork out of your dinner and just order the fixed menu.
More like 4.5 stars for this one. I had read rave reviews about this place on yelp and had always wanted to try it.... Bless my lucky stars......got invited for a friend's surprise birthday bash in their private room area, with their 5 course dinner menu Great ambiance, the private room setting was perfectly formal for a group with kids and running toddlers The service was great, we had a dedicated server, who was polite and efficient the food was tasty and tastefully served, the killer was the last but not the least course......MANGO PUDDING for dessert.......the best i have had so far.... I am hinting my friends and family......please have a surprise party for me in the same place....
Good Chinese food served in a classy environment sums it up. Definitely on the pricey side, so I'd probably just come back if I felt like being a princess (aka not wanting to sit in a typical greasy, noisy Chinese restaurant) and having a drink (they have a full bar!). Sidenote: I like how they have drinks for every zodiac sign -- cute! My drink is vodka redbull for year of the bull, appropriate for the name and especially appropriate because that's my party drink of choice... although I don't see myself getting hyphy at Taipan anytime soon.
Came here for dim sum with so co-workers and it was fabulous!  We ordered off the menu (helps to know what you like) and everything was done to perfection.  They even had the baked bbq pork buns which I've been craving for months! I will be back and I highly recommend it for a dim sum lunch!
I had such high hopes for dinner at this place. It started out with a smell of smoke coming from somewhere. Every so often, I would get a whiff of it. It could be there was someone who was a smoker nearby. No big deal, just something noticeable. The decor was nice and upscale looking though. On to the food, the crispy vegetarian egg rolls were indeed crispy and tasty. The Jai Buddha's Delight was also very good, presented in a taro bowl - different and delicious. The problem I had was with the hair in the chow mein. The waiter was informed and he apologized and took it back to the kitchen. He brings a new one and all was well or so I thought. I took home the leftovers only to discover the next day when I went to have the leftovers for lunch that there was a hair in the chow mein. Again! It kinda looked like the same hair. Was it the same hair? I don't know. I know it's not my hair, it's too short to be one of mine. So disappointed and disgusted.
Once in a while, I shed my inhibitions about ONLY going to hole-in-the-wall Chinese places -- just to broaden my horizons.  Besides, sometimes you're in the mood for Chinese with table linens and a grade of service above getting yelled at by the waitstaff, right? (Yank Sing, anyone)? If you're in such a mood, Taipan is for you.  Yes, the entrees cost more than $12, but their tea is nice, the service is good (though not outstanding), and the food is presented quite beautifully.  It's also quite tasty, even if it lacks that extra magic touch that makes a true hole-in-the-wall gem so dangerously addictive.  Flash fried beans with minced pork, Braised tofu with mushrooms, Sauteed pea shoots in garlic -- all recommended.  Contrary to what some others say, I thought the portions at dinner time were quite generous.  Full house on a Sunday evening too, including multiple tables of mainland Chinese folks trying to impress their out-of-town guests. Service is slow, particularly on water refills, but very friendly once you get their attention.
Delicious!  The food is fresh and minimally fussed over to bring out the maximum flavor.  The sweet corn soup with chicken was a little bland.  Otherwise, everything else we ordered off the menu was excellent: flounder two ways, tender beef.  The pan-fried noodle wins an honorable mention. This is a good place if you're trying to impress your most judgmental friends.  The best scenario is to invite friends who have good-Chinese-food deprivation issues or have been insulted by Jing Jing in Palo Alto. A word on decor: tasteful (wainscoting and monster orchids) but somewhat culturally confused?  The restaurant is too hidden.  It needs a storefront on University.  It might be better appreciated on Castro Avenue where it deserves a culinary neighbor like Maru-Ichi rather than the Prolific Oven.
Delicious dim sum (though you end up ordering from a picture menu vs. selecting from carts like most other more traditional dim sum places). The menu is large, but not so extensive that you get lost trying to figure out what you want. Several options for vegetarian dimsum as well. Only dimsum I miss here is the green pepper stuffed with shrimp paste....but there's always my favorite place in NJ to look forward to for that! Fast and friendly service. Kid friendly. I've been here a couple of times now and can't wait to go back again!
Hong Kong style Chinese food.  They do not serve the more common Cantonese style food.  Hong Kong style food is to Cantonese style food as fine French dining is to Bistro.  Don't get me wrong.  I love Cantonese food.  But, don't come here expecting that. The food at Taipan is unique to the Bay Area.  There is an elegance and refined quality to the food.  The price reflects the quality.  But, I think that the price is very fair for the types of ingredients used.  Real abalone, shark fin, and bird's nest are just some of the exotic edibles they have at Taipan. The service is fast and efficient.  Maybe a bit on the abrupt side. The food is consistently well cooked and seasoned.  At most of my favorite Chinese restaurants in the Bay Area, I find some good days and some bad days.  I have never had a bad meal at Taipan.  In fact, they are my go to Chinese restaurant for clients who like Chinese food. I also find that their cleanliness is top notch as restaurants go.  I have been to several places where the food is great, but I would not want to step foot in the bathroom.  Taipan is not one of those places.  The setting is luxurious, bright and very clean.  A great amount of attention has been given all aspects of the dining experience from the decor to the silverware. I also recommend the bar.  The wine list is excellent.  And, the bar stocks a variety of interesting liqueurs. This is not a cheap eats restaurant.  But, the price is reasonable.  In my opinion, the food is unique, high quality and worth the price.  It is just not an everyday place for me.
I went to Taipan last night for a friend's birthday dinner.  It was my second time and I arrived with elevated expectations from my last visit for dim sum.  The decor is a fusion of English and Chinese elegance.  Neither theme was clearly present, but the place oozed enough ambiance for the clientele. We ordered the set dinner for 10, probably what people order for weddings.  The dishes on the whole were pretty standard.  One interesting twist was the shrimp and potato soup served in a gourd-shaped bowl and covered with a baked popover. The ingredients were good quality.  The fish was live so the flesh was delicate and flaky.  The lobster was crunchy, suggesting it was probably live too.  Flavors were well balanced and not too much salt or grease for restaurant Chinese food.  I'd say nearly all of it was very well executed and given the chance, I polished off everything. As our host picked up the tab, I was in an especially good mood.  I'd imagine it would have been $40-50 per person.  Taipan is pricy, but given the consistent good eating, it's totally worth it.  Considering its location, I'd even venture to say that Taipan is a good value. Both trips, I found easy parking on the street, so I'm not sure what happened for others.  For now, I'm giving it 4 stars as I haven't found a signature dish that really wowed me.  But, I'm quite optimistic that Taipan has something up its sleeve that'll knock my socks off and demand a 5 star.
I go to Taipan a lot of dim sum. Actually when I think about it... I only go there for dim sum. I love that Taipan serves dim sum until 3 p.m. It really makes waking up in the afternoon, on the weekend, wonderful. The restaurant is elegant but the staff treats everyone the same. I have gone in there dressed professionally, in yoga clothes and in jeans and I still seem to get the same good service. The dim sum menu has a nice selection of all the normal dim sum favorites such as shrimp dumplings ($4.80), pork and dried shrimp dumplings ($5.80), pea shoot and pawns dumpling ($5.80), Sui Mai ($4.80), Shrimp rice noodle roll ($7.00), spring rolls ($3.50), Minced Shrimp Tofu ($7.00) pan fried turnip caked ($3.50) and my personal favorite dessert, sesame seed ball ($4.80). The staff is nice and the food is good. I think it is a little more expensive than push cart dim sum places but I think it's worth it because of the atmosphere.
Taipan (or Tai-Pan) Restaurant is a few months old and already has a loyal following. It's an iffy proposition putting a pricey, high quality Chinese restaurant in the exact same location as a recently departed, money losing, pricey, high quality Chinese restaurant (Hong Kong Flower Lounge). But Taipan does it better. The prices are basically on par with the old HKFL, but the environment and service has gone way upscale with soothing, bright light, beige-mauve drapes everywhere, and abundant traditional Chinese art adorning walls and housed in glass cases throughout the restaurant. Hong Kong Flower Lounge is barely recognizable. The kitchen is fast and the courteous service is what you would expect for the price. ( A major gripe of mine is that Chinese restaurants all too often keep the dour or curt behavior of greasy spoons even when you pay 5 times as much). Taipan has a Hong Kong/Shanghai focus and cautiously ventures into fusion. And they don't drop the ball too often. The worst dish I've had their was a tepid walnut shrimp dish that was smothered in a sweet mayonnaise. You can only like this dish if you adore mayo, (blech). The best dishes I've found tend to be the soups or stir fried meat dishes.  I really enjoyed their wonton soup and their stir fried lamb in the past. I haven't felt like dropping the money on one of their more expensive seafood dishes as of yet, but hopefully someone else here has and can tell us more about it. Their bar is absolutely fantastic-incredibly well stocked with basics as well as hard to find alcohol. I haven't had a chance to take a look at their wine list, but it's in a fairly thick book, so I'd assume that it's also well rounded. The head waiter, Francis, is a gin connoisseur and will expound at length about gin if you ask him about it. Sometimes he'll bring samples as well. Finally, Chinese desserts are not a strong point. But Taipan has taken efforts to go beyond the boring. They constantly try new desserts out to tempt people and the menu changes. The old Fried Banana with vanilla standbye that they offer is delectably caramelized and melting- a banana creme brulee. Entrees starting at approx $13 for noodles through $29 for seafood for dinner.
Taipan is a good Chinese restaurant  with competently cooked dishes. I would have awarded 4 stars if there were more adventurous and innovative dishes. We ordered Tender Pea Shoots poached in superior broth, Walnut Prawns, Seafood in Taro Basket and Honey smoked Sea Bass. The pea shoots were nicely poached with broth. It had slow cooked garlic cloves intermingled with a huge serving of pea shoots. Very tasty, though I would have preferred it served with less broth. The Walnut Prawns was well cooked, but ordinary as was the seafood in Taro Basket. I love deep fried Taro though, so this was a good dish for me. I had high hopes for the honey smoked sea bass and had they pulled this off, would have earned them 4 stars. The idea itself is interesting, though it could have been executed a little better. The delicate taste of the sea bass was overwhelmed by the honey and heavy smoking. Still, it was tasty. Taipan is also a little on the expensive side, but well worth a try if you are in the neighbourhood.
I don't like expensive upscale Chinese food, especially when it doesn't taste exceptionally. This place is nicely decorated, but that's about the only thing I liked. This was my second time to Taipan, and this time for another wedding rehearsal dinner (can you ask my friends to stop getting married?). Each time the service was really poor and understaffed. The waiters were not friendly and I had to ask for things twice.  For the wine drinkers, we constantly had to ask for more, and finally our whole table got fed up and starting to get the wine from another table and served ourselves the rest of the night. Each time the food quality is nothing special (trust me, I have eaten in great Chinese restaurants in Hong Kong and Taiwan). Don't waste your time here. I'd rather go to Ming's in Palo Alto or pay less for real authentic Chinese food in Cupertino, Fremont or Millbrae. Also, the waitstaff could be a little nicer or should add more staff for large private events. I wouldn't recommend hosting any large private events here.
I have been to a lot of dim sum places and I usually categorize Dim Sum places into 2 large groups: Push Cart Type (dim sum is presented to you in a caravan of carts loaded with steamer baskets, a visual feast in itself) or Order Type(mark on paper what you want). Taipan falls into the later. The establishment is fancy and clean. It is very quiet, so you won't get the feeling you're at a dim sum place with people yelling all around you. I think this is a double edged sword. It is quiet, peaceful and you can fully hear what the other people at the table are saying, but at the same time you loose the ambiance and lively feeling of being at a dim sum place. I grew up eating at push cart places and always being surrounded by lots of other people and having to talk a bit louder than normal. So, to me a quiet dim sum place just doesn't feel right. Here is what I ordered: Egg Tart: Very Average Durian Sweet Puff: I thought it was alright, but the Durian pieces seemed small, I wished they were meatier. Chicken Claw in Black Bean Sauce: Average Glutinous Rice Puff : Average taste, but a bit greasier than normal. Baked BBQ Pork Puff: Good, but not enough filling with meat pieces. Snow Bun: Very well prepared, my favorite of the meal I think Taipan is not a bad Dim Sum place as far as taste, but it is a little on the more expensive side for the quality of food you are getting. That being said, it is very clean and has a fancy upscale feel, which is probably why the dishes are more expensive. Very normal dim sum, not great or terrible, but is unique in that it is very clean and the restaurant is generally very quiet while dining.
Went to Taipan last night for a bday dinner and the food was okay. Taipan is almost like Skates in Berkeley. Really nice on the outside, disappointing in the inside and you walk out like your money could have been well spent some place else. Based on the Yelp reviews, makes this place a little overrated and overhyped. Ive been to better chinese restaurants that serve almost the same quality food for a better price. i like the inside decor decoration but it seems more catered to the white crowd - ie. PF Chang's. someone said "quality/price ratio and this place fails miserably...." i second that. and christina s who gave this place a five star with a poetic review is either biased, smoking crack or probably both. first, i'd be ashamed to bring any of my family to this place because everything is superficial. Second, nobody makes fish like the Cantonese? That's pretty hilarious. Well, the fish we had was fried, fried and FRIED. What difference does it make? Do not have your cake cut by the staff. They charge you 10 bucks. I could have done that myself. I noticed the other table was being served wine so I asked one of the waitress "are you guys charging them 10 bucks to open the bottle?" A puzzled look on her face, maybe it would have helped if I signed sign language.
Oh, how I would love to give this place a 5-star rating, but there's really just too many things that it lacks for that. That said, it really is a great restaurant - completely worthy of 4 solid stars. I've been here three times now: once for dinner, and twice for dim sum. I heard about it from a friend of mine who said this was a pretty good restaurant to try out. I have to say, that although it is pricey, they use real quality ingredients, and you can really taste it. The dim sum is above average, I'd say, but he har gow and siu mai were actually a little lackluster. Everything else was very good, though, and I'd really recommend this place for either lunch or dinner. It has a great atmosphere, great wait staff... Really, it's just a great place to eat. Unfortunately, the high price tag makes it a place you'll only visit occasionally, but that's to be expected for businesses off University.
I m having my B-day dinner here.  you? had my best Chinese meal there tonight salt/ pepper flog legs lobster noodle string beans best gai-lan ever (no baking soda) saute beef saute lamb OMG the fried rice with egg white for someone who does not eat rice n had to fight her way to keep her bowel of fried rice
Best Chinese for burgundy. been here 6 times.  consistent. egg white crab is a must.  frog leg was... Read more 
Christmas Eve dinner was PACKED! Our family met my brother's fiancee's parents for dinner and Taipan didn't disappoint. I can't go into detail about every dish we ate (and we ate and ate and ate), but the standout was the seafood bisque.  It probably is the least authentic Chinese dish on the menu, but delightfully prepared and served in a coconut cup befitting of a mai tai.  Maybe the restaurant should be called mai taipan?
I guess this place is known for their Dim sum. We didn't try any, so can't comment on it. Here are my top level takeaways. Over priced, under flavoured, overrated. Nothing in my meal stood out. There is no way taipan earns a 4 star average.
Without beating around the bush, the portions were rather small compared to most other chinese food restaurant portions and the prices were out of this world! I got two chicken dishes, a soup and a vegetable side and thought it would be close to $45 after looking at the online menu that included prices and when I got there, it was $10 more. Don't get me wrong, the food was delicious, but I just don't see why it should cost so much more for considerably less... I ordered to-go, so I know nothing about the service, atmosphere, etc., but to be quite honest, I don't think there is any reason I would feel like I was missing out if I never ordered or ate-in there again.
Are you serious? +$10 for a fried rice or fun? NO way For a place that serves standard chinese food that you can get for 1/2 the price...........I'm not too sure this is worth going out of your way for. The oxtail in claypot was pretty much filled with stewed carrots, and the oxtail had hardly any meat on it. My friends MOM makes an even better version. The lamb with XO sauce...totally forgettable. All the way out to PA for this..............when i could have gotten it around the street.
There's definitely a shortage of good Cantonese  style Chinese cuisine in the south bay. So when Hong Kong Flower Lounge opened here I was quite happy even though it just wasn't as good as the one in Millbrae. One day I see that it's closed and that Tai Pan was soon to take over. I walked by several times and saw the construction and labor going on. Looked promising. When they finally opened I took a Cantonese friend over to give it a try. This was no ordinary Cantonese place. Everything seemed very upscale, nice decor, huge wine list and the owners greeted us at the door with warmth and friendliness. Now I'm used to the Cantonese type places where service and friendliness aren't the main attractions but the food is enough to tolerate that. As we perused the menu I found many of the common things I'd order and some stuff I'd never seen anywhere. So we decided on the following meal: Salt and Pepper Scallops Beef Chow Fun with Chives Fresh Maine Lobster prepared Hong Kong Sampan Style Ox Tail Clay Pot Pinot Noir The first three dishes were pretty well done in traditional Cantonese way while the clay pot had a bit of a modern twist. The Lobster was quite good but on the expensive side, but then I've been spoiled by what you can get in SoCal (Capital Seafood rewlz). The clay pot dish was wonderful since I hadn't had anything like that before and can only deduce this had to be noveau compared to the rest of the plates. My Oxtail experience has mostly been from the Cuban style variety. Definitely a unique dish. All in all a great experience even though I'd never experienced Cantonese food in such a formal setting. The owners and the rest of the wait staff  were so personable it didn't feel PA snooty at all, so I'm definitely going to head back and try a few more things.
Wow, another place in Palo Alto that can be deceiving if you only pay attention to appearances. I'm all about the quality/price ratio, and this place fails miserably in that respect. I've only come here once, and it was free since it was a company holiday party...and even then I thought it was a waste of my time. Still, I suppose it's possible that I'm a little too harsh on this place. If money is growing on a tree in your backyard and you value decor above food quality then Taipan might just be the place for you.
Pretty legit, although I have had much better steamed fish, I must give my regards: -Excellent English speaking servers w/brocade outfits -Whitetable cloths instead of the crazy pink crap -SQUARE tables -Clean facilities w/cool ornate Chinese trinkets -Live harpist, a little on the loud side, but it's nice to drown out the neighbors -Perfectly cooked Shanghai Crab -Do the pea sprouts here, not overcooked & no filmy oil Great Chinese on the Peninsula w/o the typical ambiance.
It's actually a 4.5 star rating, the only reason i docked off a 1/2 star is because we had to ask for water refills and drinks wise they didn't check up on us much. However, the decor inside is very beautiful and you're quickly greeted by the waitstaff and the owner (I think).  For 6 people, we ordered: lobster sampan style, singaporean style noodles, prawns with walnuts, eggrolls, potstickers, jade basil chicken, house fried rice.  Definitely try the lobster sampan style, it was perfectly crispy and salty and meaty.  It's more expensive than your average Chinese restaurant but I thought everything was delicious, light tasting and not heavy.  Out of the dishes we ordered, I'd recommend the walnut prawns, lobster and singaporean style noodles.
I looooooove this place.  Very authentic Hong Kong style food, great interior, great service, but on the more expensive end.  The honey beef was incredibly tender and delicious, as was the vermicelli with pork, shrimp and egg.  The mango pudding dessert was soooo cute - it came in a champagne glass with some condensed milk on top and tasted as good as it looked (real mango, not just custard with mango flavoring).  I'll come here again the next time someone else is paying ;) Addendum: I went during lunch and had their dimsum.  While pricey, it was absolutely delicious.  I recommend the har gow or the steamed pork buns!
I had heard so much about this restaurant and decided to find out if the establishment lives up to its reputation.  Everything was fresh, and delicious but the price didn't seem to convince me to continue going back on a regular basis. The spare ribs were yummy, and the Basil Spicy chicken was flavorful. Fresh food.  We had the honeyed glazed sea bass and it was not fresh. Finally,  the Mango Mousse was highly recommended on yelp,  so we all tried one.  Disappointed. I felt it was dry and lacked that moist, sweet ,slippery texture  a fresh mango mousse should have. I was disappointed since our dinner bill came to over $200 I would go back but not often
Undoubtedly pricey but my family and I never had a bad meal here.  Consistently good Chinese and since we're regulars we usually receive prompt and friendly service.  Jeannie always gives us a warm welcome.  Dim sum is some of the best I've ever had.  Some may complain that the dim sum isn't different, exotic, or varied but is it necessary when the quality is outstanding?  The usual siu mai, har gow, deep fried taro root, crab claws are excellent.  Usually serene ambience.  Don't come here if you want servers to throw dishes at you--this is a classy Chinese restaurant.  =)
It's pricey and service was slow. The sea bass we ordered, still have scales attached to the skin,  'Twice cooked smoked pork ribs' may worth to try, and other dishes were not up to expectation. Ning
I went to Taipan with my family this past weekend and had a very enjoyable experience.  The jasmine tea is delicious and the waiters are quick to refill (as they did many times for my party of 6). We ordered a total of 7 dishes: Crispy vegetarian spring roll Pan fried pot stickers Walnut Prawns Fried Rice with pork and shrimp Vermicelli Singapore style Lobster Sampan Style Jade Basil Chicken The walnut prawn were my favorite, with a creamy marinade and the slightly candied walnuts.   Neither the sauce/marinade nor the walnuts were overpowering, creating the perfect combination of flavors and textures. The lobster sampan style was also great, tossed in a light batter and sauteed with salt and garlic.  The crispy bits of garlic and salt were delicious and added a great texture contrast to the lobster. Vermicelli Singapore style had a hint of curry, which made it even more delicious.  The shrimp in this dish had a more chewy texture though, which I didn't enjoy as much as those in the walnut prawns dish.  It was a light dish but still filling, which made all the more better. Pot stickers and vegetarian spring rolls were equally as good, each served with their own sauce on the side and crispy to perfection. The Jade Basil chicken was the heaviest dish we ordered, so much so we ordered some steamed rice to accompany it.  The chicken, red and green bell peppers and onions were sauteed in a somewhat thick chinese-style sauce and tossed with basil leaves.  Overall a good dish, but probably best to eat as one of the first dishes (we ordered it very last). I really enjoyed my dinner at Taipan.  Perhaps a bit pricy, but split 6 ways it really wasn't too bad.  The waiters also recommend some dishes over others, which was nice of them to do.   The Hong Kong style of chinese food seemed lighter and less oily than typical chinese cuisine, which is what I liked most about this restaurant.
Food in general is pretty good if you know what to order.  Service is good but be prepared to have an extended lunch...it's just slow.  The owners can be a bit too attentive....yes, it can be a bad thing. I wish they served dim-sum for lunch...it's such a shame that they don't.
I went to Taipan lastnight for my mother's birthday dinner with a crowd that's hard to please... from an older generation that couldn't take spicy food and chewy meat to a white guy who couldn't take authentic dishes... and Taipan was a risk on our palates. Oh.. but they delivered!  From the friendly hellos, the nice ambience, to the excellent dishes,  this was a place that maintained high standards and met ours. I recommend the following: Honey smoked seabass (fresh and tender) , Ox-tail claypot in redwine sauce (very succulent), Shanghai grabs (fried to perfection on the outershell, the portioned crab meat with eggs were a nice touch). I would skip the following: Two taste flounder (nothing special and the fried portion was so dry), seafood medley in taro nest (nothing special), chrysanthemum tea (way too strong). Overall, great dining experience and not too expensive at around $30 per person if you have small to average appetite (portions are small)and you don't mind paying for the ambience and not the hole-in-the-wall experience.
Happy Year of the Tiger! A client treated me (nice role-reversal, indeed!) for lunch at Taipan and we decided on several dim sum dishes and the vegetarian hot and sour soup.  We both enjoyed everything, especially the soup.  I was reminded of the excellent quality Taipan provides, and how I miss my more frequent visits of the past few years.  I need to schedule more meetings in Palo Alto!  Dim sum is now served till 3:00 pm.
If you're looking for an upscale location to impress a date or client -- or to host a corporate... Read more 
I love dim sum. Usually, dim sum places are noisy, crowded, hot, and messy, but not here. Taipan is great for when you're in the mood for a more upscale dim sum experience. I took some out of town visitors here who were looking to get some good Chinese food in the Bay Area. Things to get: lobster with noodles, shrimp dumplings, shrimp rolls, shao mai, taro snow bun, taro dumplings with pork (my fave), turnip cake Things to consider skipping: seafood soup with pastry puff (This was kind of like clam chowder with a pastry puff - the flavors of the two didn't mesh and seemed like two disparate parts. Maybe my expectations were a bit high, since I much prefer the soup with pastry puff at Tommy Toy's in SF, which is really well done.) I definitely want to come back here sometime and try one of their prix fixe dinners!
Very good.  Nice ambience; a bit more upscale than most traditional dim sum restaurants.  The food is great, though the service is barely OK.
This was my first official restaurant meal after arriving in the area. I was not disappointed. The ambiance and the setting were great for Sunday night. The tea was individually seeped for every pot/table which was nice. Definitely on the pricey side, but the menu is diverse and the flavors will not disappoint.
We came here on a Monday night and the service was terrible.  It took them nearly an hour and half for them to bring out the dishes.  Luckily my friends are very patient, otherwise I would have left and ate a restaurant that's authentic and cheaper. It's a no-no for me at Taipan.  =(
Wow, a nice Palo Alto dim sum place. Service is subpar - I had to flag down a server to get anything I needed during the meal, but hey -- it looks nice. Oh, and I also had to endure overhearing some borderline racist conversation by the old white farts who were next to us. Bottom line? Come here for convenient dim sum deliciousness. Be prepared to palm-face when it comes to service, clientele, and price.
A little backdrop on just how not easy it is to find a restaurant where all nine of us could dine together.  I was very nervous because of the diversity of our group.  Please read on. I posed a question on Yelp Talk asking for suggestions for a Chinese restaurant that was clean, upscale, authentic, and would listen to my request for gluten free dishes.  People suggested this place.  So for Christmas dinner, we booked a table for nine.  We have an eclectic mix in our group so I was nervous about finding just the right Chinese restaurant that wouldn't scare my husband's side of the family off ie. no place where they'd need to wipe the grease off the menu before reading it or dip chopsticks and spoon in tea before using. I needed a place that could satisfy: Two celiacs One 80 year old whose heart belongs to steak and french fries One baby One grade schooler who won't try anything different or eat anything that has a smell One low fat/low carb/low sodium/no low quality food adult One pescatarian My husband and I are the latter two and already we've got issues.  Add on his family and you got a recipe for a headache.  Because I wanted to flex my daughter-in-law muscles and show though I can't cook up a feast like my SIL I sure can find a great restaurant, I put a lot of pressure on myself.  If this restaurant didn't work out, I'm useless. By the time we left the restaurant at around 7 PM, it was 3/4 full on Christmas Eve. I ordered for us away from our table because I didn't want our party to blurt out things like fried wontons, beef and broccoli, mu shu pork, etc.  I wanted them to get away from that for one night.  I managed to order some more authentic Chinese dishes that I thought they would like, but probably hadn't thought of ordering before, but also not as authentic as any organ meats, as even I have my limits.  However, we ended up having to order a sweet and sour pork for the picky kid. I give this place four stars because I didn't feel the menu was that great.  I also felt a tad rushed to order, but it was Christmas Eve, so I can't expect exceptional service, but it was average service.  Efficient service, not "H,i how was your dinner?  We enjoy having you dine with us today!" Sorry I don't remember what we ordered and I'm too lazy to pull up their menu, but I remember a lot of vegetables, steamed egg dish, sizzling beef, a fish (half fried - was told it's their signature dish.  Don't bother, nothing to write home about and very little meat on the fish). I don't know what the damage was as my FIL paid, but everyone told me what a great choice of a restaurant, and for that, I'm relieved.  I don't think I will return because it is a bit expensive and I don't mind eating at cheaper Chinese restaurants.  The only time we'll be back is probably when the FIL or MIL want to come back and pay for it.  It's comfortable, no loud servers and they all speak English fluently.  Good atmosphere.
East meets Silicon Valley/Stanford University.  Fine Chinese dining is what you will find at Taipan.  It is certainly pricey here, but the food is very fresh and well prepared.  The soups, hot n sour, and seafood, are not worth ordering.  I did have the prawns in special soy sauce at the recommendation of my waitress and was very pleased.  The shrimps were very flavorful cooked in a light soy/garlic sauce.  It is truly and outstanding dish.  The steamed rice was cooked to perfection.  At last, being in the Bay area this week I have had great steamed rice at most every Chinese restaurant I have visited--take not DC!
If you are looking for good hong-kong style cantonese food, this is the place.  Went there twice in one week to check out their dim sum selection as well as their dinner menu. Its a bit pricey, atleast 1.5X the price of other dim sum places, but the quality is worth it. For dinner we ordered: -walnut prawns-yummy, but for $16 dollars it should be. -shanghai crab (deep fried with sauce)-yummy. well seasoned and worth getting messy over -egg white fried rice with dry scallop-super yummy. Im a huge fried rice fan...and was pleasantly suprised of how light and yet flavorful this dish is. -baby bakchoy in soup-refreshing and cooked just right so it stayed a good balance of crisp and cooked throughout the whole meal. Dimsum lunch: everything is made to order and tasted fresh pass on: -steamed bbq pork bun-decent. ive had better -Chinese broccoli-slightly overcooked for my taste. i like it a bit crispier -sticky rice in lotus leaf-mediocre. i would pass on this next time thumbs up: -shanghai dumpling-fresh and tasty -*fried meat paste and chive dumpling-probably my favorite dish. the consistency of the fried outer shell and the mochi-like consistency on the inside with meat and chive taste is exquisite. -*baked custard bun-yummy. definately think the chef is also a great baker -*peking duck with bun-pricey $8 for 2 pieces. but phenomenal.  just the right amount of crisp and fat. some places over do it with the fat.
This is perhaps the closest thing that I've seen to a Hong Kong-esque style restuarant here in the US; Comfortable atmosphere, great service, elegant presentation, and fantastic food. I sampled the grilled lamp chops, "gnow yook sup chow haw fun" (This version of the beef chow fun is served with gravy instead of dry), "pei dahn sow yook jook" (porridge), and "dow miu" (bean shoots).  Everything was fantastic! The bar was impressive and very well stocked.  They even serve a lychee martini which at this point, I had only seen in HK. I would highly recommend this place.  I'm definitely going back to try more of the menu and the lychee martini and I'm bringing all my friends with me. PS - Went back a few times.  Be sure to try the following: Salt & Pepper Calimari, Twice cooked Honey Spare Ribs, vegetarian egg rolls (try it with the spicy mustard), steamed rock cod fish,...we couldn't go wrong. PPS - If you know your way around Cantonese food, don't be afraid to try and order things off the menu.
Went here last night for the first time- and unluckily for my group, it was Valentine's day. I didn't realize there would be a Vday fix prixe menu going on at a Chinese restarant - but then again, it IS Palo Alto. My own bad.... I 'd give them more stars - but quite frankly for my experience I'm being very generous. While I have no qualms about the food - it was fresh quality stuff, but its the PAINSTAKINGLY LONG AND ARDUOUS WAIT that killed me! And its hard to hate because the decor is beautiful, prices are reasonable (for a high-end HK Style restaurant) & service is very friendly. I might go back again... just cuz i know yesterday was an anomaly. But  at the same time, I'm still pissed that it took them between 30-45 minutes between dishes that I have to seek retribution somehow. Perhaps a temporary ban on my part.
Wonderful Hong Kong style Chinese restaurant! They, the staff and the owner, greet you with a friendly smile once you enter this place. Great service and delicious food! The one dish I must rave about is the Honey Smoked Sea Bass. The pieces just melts in my mouth! This is a delicious combination. All of their other dishes are prepared very well, too. And they taste great! The price is a bit high, but in my opinion, worth it, as you get very tasty food!
Delicious food and fantastic service! I came here for a business dinner and it couldn't have gone better. Everything came out in a timely manner and the staff was always checking in on us....almost a little too much. But that's way better than some chinese restaurants where they don't give you a second glance after dropping the food at your table. I'll take an overly attentive staff anyday. Anyway, I certainly recommend this place for a fantastic and enjoyable meal. Then again, I don't consider myself an expert in Chinese....and my standards are rather questionable I'm sure. I'm perfectly happy eating at a local chinese fast food and chompin' down some garlic chicken and fried rice for $5   =P
This place rocks. Awesome Chinese. It's restrained in an American way a bit with the flavors/oils, but very skillfully and flavorfully. Gourmet Chinese that delivers on skill, taste, service, and presentation. Went here for both dim sum and a banquet, multiple course dinner courtesy of Stanford. It's not THAT pricey. It's way better than Mandarin Gourmet. Will write more later...
Mai Tais off the MF'n chain.  The food is very different than your average run of the mill Chinese spot.  I like the flavors but the portions could be more. It was family style, so maybe I should try it without a 6 person entrourage. Great for an white table cloth dinner with friends and some wine and of course Mai Thais.  Not really my type of joint, (Paly Alto) I'm definitely standing out there like "who brought the guy from ESSJ with the curly Afro?" and "why is he requesting Hennessy?" lol. I recommend it if you want a high brow Chinese spot to impress your high snobiety friends. Some high society folks took me of course or else I would have never been there.  ta hehe. ENJOI
While this looks like a great place for dim sum or a large corporate or social banquet, I've not tried either -- just an early dinner so far. (we were thinking of getting take-away while working on a project, but after seeing how nice the restaurant was, decided to dine in) We had the "buddha's delight" vegetarian dish, which, even as a carnivore, I enjoyed, mongolian beef, and chow fun beef -- it was great learning that chow fun are in fact rice noodles, so my wheat-averse friend could eat it.  The food itself was quite good overall, both in ingredients and preparation. Wait staff were incredibly friendly and attentive, but this may have been a function of time of day (5pm, before presumably a larger evening crowd), where we were the first people in for the evening. While it's a little expensive ($55 for 3 dishes, 2 people, no drinks), I wouldn't consider this overly expensive, especially for Palo Alto, the general level of ambiance/service, and quality of food.  I'll definitely go back to try dim sum as soon as possible.
4 for food.  Minus 1 for price, We tried the ox tail and home style tofu tonight.  The ox tail is very good, but the portions are slightly small.  The tofu is ok, but not great.  The bill came to around $30, which is on the pricey side for Chinese, but you do get the nicer ambiance. We were thinking of having our wedding reception here, since it does serve authentic Chinese food but has a classy clean ambiance.  However, it's $500 min per table and $20 corking fee.  Which may be ok, except that the portions are small.  And for that much, I wouldn't want the guests to be hungry at the reception - which appears to be what happened to one reviewer.
I've been here several times now, and with each experience, i must admit i was never disappointed. From the moment i set foot in until my last bite of savoring mango pudding...yUUmmmmmM! Tai Pan is more upscale then most traditional Chinese places here in the bay area with their unforgettable decor to their elegant way of plating each dish. Things are a bit pricey, however, it is NOT your ordinary hole in the wall Chinese restaurant. Technically, you're paying for the environment , the service that you're receiving, lastly the quality of the food and NOT the quantity. Salt and pepper scallops - yumMMmm everything was seasoned and cooked perfect salt and peppered lobster with salted egg - my first time having lobster....and i must say its the best by far abalone - they're abalone is really tender and flavorful...way better than hk flower lounge and any of the other places ive had....surprisingly it wasnt super chewy and hard, the texture was perfect Mango pudding - hands down, this is the best mango pudding i've ever had...i've had mango pudding at most every chinese restaurant and it is NOT comparable to tai pan... i think i almost always come back to tai pan for their mango pudding lol I would definitely come back just for the mango pudding and maybe lobster! :)
The place to go if you've got some friends or family in town. Service is great and when you walk in, everything looks nice n tidy. =] The owner greeted my friend and I so that was a plus. Ordering food was no problem and the longest wait I've had here was like 10 min tops. Order family style instead of single chow mein dishes, you get more bang for your bucks.
I think I found my new favorite Chinese restaurant. I was pleasantly surprised by the whole experience. I was looking for a nice place that served authentic Chinese food, and that's exactly what I found. The ambiance is lovely and clean with a pretty decor, which I find is rare at many Chinese restaurants. My friend and I ordered several dim sum dishes, along with the beef chow mien. All of the dishes were presented nicely and were very rich in flavor. I highly recommend the spareribs. They are tender with a nice, sweet flavor. I had lunch there yesterday and would go again today and tomorrow if it wasn't so far from work. I guess I'll have to make the trek up there for dinner.
The quality of the dim sum here seems to have degraded a bit over the last few months.  Sad to say that it is to a point that I don't think it's worth the premium price they charge anymore. Still a decent place for business dinner though...
We have not tried dinner here yet, but their dim sum here is better than most average dim sum... Read more 
The sea bass is delectable.  Chinese broccoli is passable, and the chicken stir fry is average.  It is really expensive.  The decor feels unauthentic.
2.5 stars, but I'm feeling friendly so I'll round up. Besides, they had a creative (and tasty) drink menu, so that's a plus. I guess I just don't get Taipan. I was really looking forward to eating there and I walked away thinking, "well, it wasn't horrible, but it wasn't special. Why did I pay so much?". Granted- we didn't do dim-sum, and I've heard that's very good. I will not return to Taipan, simply because I don't see a reason to. To me, it's the same as ever-other Chinese place and while I appreciate the atmosphere and drinks, I'm not paying that much money for it.
I'm from Singapore, so I'm used to quality Asian food and I'm glad to say I won brownie points bringing my family here.  extremely refined Chinese cuisine--it's the real deal!  We only ordered 7 dishes but I can tell that pretty much everything on the dinner menu is solid, especially the steamed egg that came with the crab!!  *falls to floor drooling*  We also had the kai lan (Chinese broccoli), fried tofu, beef hor fun, seafood soup and roast duck. The only drawbacks: I found the steamed BBQ pork buns disappointing, and the food *is* a little overpriced.  But it's well worth it to have a good Chinese meal in a beautiful restaurant.
Dim sum here is fantastic!  Definitely someplace I can take my mom to without getting judged on the fancy decor (usually, fancy decor = not so great dim sum. Think Ming's.).  The short ribs were the best I've ever had, the egg custards fresh and hot, and the dumplings clearly were not frozen.  I don't think they offered any of the more exotic foods though, so no chicken feet or tripe.  Perhaps you could special order it; I did not ask. Yes, it is pricey, so not an everyday dim sum joint.  My one big gripe is that they charged $2/person for tea!!!  WTF.  You do not charge for tea at dim sum.  Minus one star for that. EDIT: My mom just schooled me on the whole tea thing.  You DO pay for tea, unless you know the owner.  Apparently I have been spoiled in LA by my mom knowing where to go for dim sum all this time.  So my bad - $2/tea is standard.
Food OK but not great, service attentive but annoying, prices too high for the quality of the food. Food was middle of the road on taste and quality.  It certainly was not bad, but neither was it memorable in any way. Felt constantly hurried by the waiter, even though the restaurant was nearly empty.  Got "the look" when I asked for black pepper to spice up one dish. Prices were about 50%-100% higher than for equivalent food at other restaurants. Surprised at the limited number of pork dishes on the menu. Decor is very nice and upscale. Maybe going for Dim Sum would have been better...not really available at dinner, though...
already been there few times in two months...the dim sums r soooooooooo good... good quality food with reasonable price!!! LOVE IT~ will go for dinner~
Stratospheric dim sum dining is here in Palo Alto where price is no object to some. Taipan's cosy setting is inviting; the opulent over the top soy sauce container discerningly unwieldy. The price of dim sum has ballooned to $7-$8 a plate for familiar fares such as cheong fun. Selection of dim sum is fairly limited and quality ranges from run-of-the-mill to above average fresh tasting. No stand outs worth special mentions but solid execution is evident throughout the meal. Tea served is just average and should be of a higher quality. Probably the most expensive dim sum in the bay area. Diners are essentially paying a premium for a cosy chat and nibble downtown. Its predecessor the Flower Lounge on the other hand was a fish market. .
Just ate here with Gracie. Nice setting. Its like fine dining chinese food. Ingredients looks really fresh and the actual chefs comes out to serve you. Very quaint and mellow for a Wednesday evening. Ordered the ff Crispy seabass for appetizer Seafood broth soup Fresh maine lobster with e fu noodles Sauteed mushroom w/ snow peas Oxtail claypot + a cup of rice $98 tax included ... pretty decent. I like the setting and nice to come on a hump day ... well served.
Fancy but not a very functional restaurant.  Old fashioned elegance but service falls short.  Not at all hip.  Not where the young crowd goes. With a group?  Get ready for the 20% gratuity they will gift themselves.
Went with my family during Mother's day for dinner. Ordered the ff: Fish Maw w/ crab meat soup--kinda bland but really good crab and fish  maw (my mom liked it) Honey Glazed Spare ribs-- excellent, very tender but also very sweet Dim sum Plate-- 6 pieces of dimsum, 2 shu-mai, 2 spinach dumplings, 2 shrimp-dumpling combo--excellent dimsum but very minimal pieces Mongolian beef--very flavorful, not too spicy or salty.. just right Pan fried HK style noodles--good & tasty but wish there was chicken in there and more condiments Taro Bird Nest with seafood Medley-- medium ok. nothing too special about it. Custard bun--awesome, just like in SF Chinatown Overall, i have eaten chinese restaurant with a lot cheaper price. For the area of palo alto, this is the best Chinese restaurant for now. The presentation is very classy and decorative; the taste is mediocre, more catered to americans than to chinese people.
My mom made a reservation here for dinner with my brother, my grandmother, my aunt, and me.  I think she found it randomly on Yelp. I went in at first, and not sure if my mom had already arrived, asked if they had a reservation under my mom's name.  Turns out their host station is by the door, but all the hosts are standing about 10 feet inside the restaurant by the bar.  Strange.  The hostess looks at a paper book on the station, and I happen to look over her shoulder and don't see my mom's name or anything resembling it.  The hostess can't find the name, and I tell her I'll call my mom and ask.  Head back out, mom comes about 5 minutes later, and we go back in.  Different hostess, turns out my mom made a reservation online, and her name is on the computer.  Umm . . . weird, but I'll go with the flow. Restaurant is very clean, has a very classy atmosphere, and tables are well-spaced.  Chairs are super comfortable too.  Everything is clean and snowy white.  They have cute teapots too. We get waited on pretty quickly, and I'm not sure if it's intentional, but we end up with a waiter that speaks Mandarin.  We have to explain that my grandmother is vegan, and doesn't eat garlic, ginger, or onions.  The waiter catches on immediately and is able to suggest how to order our two vegetable dishes, and clarifies that it will basically be cooked with oil and salt.  The kitchen gets it right too - no need to send dishes back. Food: Shanghai dumplings - tasty, very tender pork inside, a bit dry on the outside.  Excellent red vinegar served with the dumplings.  Shanghai dumplings are supposed to have soup inside, and these were a little light on the soup. Tender Pea Shoots - ordered without the Garlic.  Well cooked, and high quality pea shoots used for this one. Sauteed Mushrooms and Snap Peas - Snap peas were excellent.  My grandmother seemed quite happy with the dish.  Also used one type of mushroom that I've never seen before Whole Crispy Peking Duck - mmm, Peking duck.  Crisp skin, tender meat.  Just a touch oily on this one, but otherwise great. Tappan Beef with Garlic Noodle - beef, bell peppers, green beans on a bed of bean sprouts and noodles.  Great beef, tender and flavorful.  The noodles were really peppery though.  My aunt made the comment that this dish seemed Americanized, though she ate it anyways. For dessert, we got sesame balls and mochi.  Both great, appropriate temperature, no complaints here. Service: Great service; no problems flagging down someone for various things, and they kept a good eye on the tea.  Our main waiter was willing to have long conversations, and endured various questions like whether the sesame balls were fried in pig lard (no, they're not.  Among other things, lard is now more expensive than vegetable oil!) Location: Convenient public parking lot right next to the restaurant, and only 2 blocks from the City Hall garage. Price: $30 per person for Chinese?  Also, $2 per person for tea!  Probably good for business dinners, but I don't think I'd eat here on a regular basis just for the price.
My friends who live in the area took me here for dim sum.  They are from Hong Kong so have pretty discriminating taste buds when it comes to dim sum.  Everything we had was great and did not seem crazy pricey.  Portions seemed typical for dim sum.  Service was pretty good and the restaurant is nicely decorated.  Definitely will come back on my next visit.
Last night, we ate at sea bass heaven (a.k.a. Tai Pan), and I can't wait to go back! My hubby and I arrived a little early for our 6pm reservation, and we were pleasantly surprised to be greeted outside the door by the lady owner (I recognized her from the photo on their website).  I say pleasantly surprised because this rarely happens (if at all), in the Mountain View / Palo Alto area. We were promptly seated at a table of our choice.  We asked for hot tea while we perused the menu.  The jasmine tea that came was most certainly the best I've had in a restaurant in SFO and the South Bay.  Dinner was off to a good start. We chose the following items: Appetizer:   Tai-Pan Peking Duck with Lotus Bun Soup:  Braised Crab Meat Shark's Fin Soup Entrees:  Honey Smoked Sea Bass & Prawn with lobster sauce Rice:  Fried rice Yang Zhau style The Peking Duck with lotus bun was EXCELLENT!  The duck itself was perfectly seasoned, with very delicious crispy skin.  It was served in a folded white bun (the same kind used for sio-pao or steamed pork buns) with spring onions and hoisin sauce.  So good! The crab meat shark's fin soup was on the bland side, and I was slightly disappointed as I really missed delicious and authentic shark's fin soup.  However, the blandness was easily fixed with a touch of soy sauce and chili sauce, both of which were provided at our table at the start of the meal. The prawns in oyster sauce and the fried rice were nothing out of the ordinary.  In fact, the prawns were just medium-sized and bland, not the big, sweet, and succulent ones I was expecting.  My hubby, always in search of good Yang Zhau-style fried rice, was also a bit disappointed.  The fried rice came loaded with pork bits and shrimp (which was the same size and taste as the prawns).  But it was somehow short of savory, which is how we like our Yang Zhau fried rice. But then came the Honey Smoked Sea Bass, and all our disappointment flew out the door.  It had a slightly sweet glaze on the outside (which had a subtle Cantonese barbecue taste similar to that of char-siu).  The sea bass meat itself was sweet, perfectly seasoned, and so tender that it was shaking like a piece of jello when we served it out, and practically melted in the mouth.  YUMMM! Throughout the meal, our hot tea was constantly replenished and so was the water.  So efficient was the wait staff that a couple of times I was surprised that my water glass was full again, because I didn't notice anyone refilling it (or maybe I was too engrossed in the sea-bass). We didn't order dessert anymore, as we were so full by the end of the meal. All in all, it was a great meal - bit on the pricey side, but well worth it.  The two owners even thanked us and bade us to have a good night on our way out, and that was a big plus as well. Next time we'll try the following:  minced chicken in lettuce cup and crispy salt and pepper calamari (appetizers), hot and sour soup or sea jewels bisque baked in pastry (I was actually a bit guilty about eating shark's fin, as it endangers several species of shark), a larger order of the Peking duck, mango pudding for dessert, and of course, more of the Honey Smoked sea bass. So yes, we'll be back, and we'll be bringing our foodie friends along!  :-) ============== UPDATE:  (11/2007) So I did bring my friends to Tai Pan, and for my birthday at that.  This is only  after we've ordered food to go here a couple of times, just to make sure of the food quality in the restaurant. I don't know if they were just having an off day then, or if they're not used to big groups, but things just didn't go as smoothly as the first time we visited.  One of the wait staff had some difficulty communicating with us (long story), and another staff had to come by and help her understand what we wanted. Then when our food came, the Minced Chicken in Lettuce Cup was somewhat cold and dry, and the Peking Duck (we ordered a whole one) not as juicy as before. Most disappointing of all, the Honey-Smoked Sea Bass - my favorite - was definitely not as flavorful. One of the new things we ordered though - the salt and pepper fish - was very good, so they get to keep three stars (I docked one from my previous review of 4 stars). For the price we paid, I'd expect more consistency both in the food's quality and the service.  I don't think we'll be going back any time soon...we'll continue looking for consistently good Chinese food with consistently great service elsewhere.
This place has the best dim sum!!  The creme brulee, shrimp balls and salt and pepper calamari are some of the best around!! And the owner is the sweetest lady.
Taipan markets itself as a more upscale Chinese restaurant.  Sure, it is not cheap but at least the food is good with great decor and ambiance.  It's definitely not one of those loud, hectic Chinese restaurants!  Taipan's dishes are all prepared with care, and appeals to Chinese and non-Chinese alike.  I have been there for both lunch and dinner and like both equally. Personally, I think the best deal is the lobster set menu.  For $38 a person, you can get a 5-course meal, each dish very tasty, with the highlight being the lobster course.  My hubby and I took our parents here, and they all really liked it.  I'd definitely recommend this restaurant if you're willing to pay a little higher than average for Chinese food.
My friends and I visited Tai Pan four times in the past year and we loved it every time.  We tried it again this week and it's still our favorite Chinese restaurant in Town.  We love the freshness of their food, the service, and the atmosphere. Tai Pan is very clean and very beautiful inside.  It's a great place to bring special friends on a special occation since it's quite priacy. Some of the delicious dishes we ordered, Eggplant  & Sea Bass in a clay pot, the Tofu appetizer, and the Salty Fish Fried Rice.
It's great to have such a good Chinese restaurant in Palo Alto.  Not only is the food very tasty, it is also consistent from visit to visit, and the ambiance is pleasant... unlike most Chinese restaurants in this area. My votes for improvements would be to have more interesting wines, especially by the glass, to match the food.  Also, the TV in the bar area detracts from the overall feel.
Fresh food Good quality Bland taste in some dishes Ask for xtra xtra spicy
I've dined here a couple of times. Their dim sum is really good. The service on the other hand could have been better the most recent time I went. The lady was so mean and rude. But the food was still very good. The last time I dined here was the first time I used their restroom. Ekkk it's so gross in there. It's the worst when a restaurant has a dirty bathroom. GAG, not a pretty sight.
I was excited to try out this place! I finally went last Saturday night with my husband. Going into it, I knew that it was pricey. I really don't have a problem paying a lot of money for good food. For appetizer, we had the twice-cooked baby honey spare ribs. It was pretty good. The meat was tender. For our main entrees, we had the egg fried rice with dry scallop and Mongolian beef. The food was just okay. I had better Chinese food for half the price of what we paid for. Overall,ambiance and service is good but the food I thought food is overpriced.
Definitely the best Chinese food you can find in bay area. Tonight we have giant prawns with deep-fried garlic and chili pepper (Bi-Feng-Tan style), steamed Rock Cod whole fish, lightly blanched giant sliced clam served in shell with a touch of light soy sauce, mixed vege served in a paper thin nest, and stir-fried rice with egg white and scallops. If you are a seafood maniac, remember to ask the waiter/waitress what fresh seafood they have of the day, you will be surprised by the dishes which usually are off the menu.
Refined, tranquil, white table cloth dining room with tasteful lighting. Honey beef with garlic was a phenomenal dish -- plump, deep brown, meltingly tender little chunks of beef, with subtle sweetness and deep flavor, though I couldn't detect a lot of garlic, served with diced onion that wasn't at all pungent or "hot."  Salt and pepper calamari also good -- lightly breaded pieces of tender squid with finely diced sweet red pepper and a fruity sauce with a hint of (ginger?).  Knocking off a star because service, although responsive to requests and professional in the sort of distantly formal sense, could have been more attentive, and my appetizer, soup, and entree all were served within a 5 minute period rather than allowing for some space.
High end chinese food - pricier items, but nice decor. Servers are dressed in chinese uniforms. Dishes are presented beautifully. Sweet and sour pork comes in a pineapple shell. Walnut prawns are juicy and there are lots of lightly toasted walnuts. Food doesn't feel greasy. Tea is tasty. Would come back, but again, it is on the pricier side. We ordered tea, 2 cokes, appetizer of calamari, chicken fried rice, walnut prawns, sweet sour pork, mongolian beef and the tab was $80.
I've eaten here many, many times over the years and it is in fact one of the few places that my Hong Kong relatives will agree to go to when they are in town. Seems that most of the reviews are for dim sum, and while I have been there for dim sum, I prefer going for dinner. Yes, it's pricey.  However, the food is not greasy, they don't use MSG, the decor is beautiful and the service has been fast (at least for delivery of the food, tougher to get a water refill). Their spare ribs are superb, the ultra crisp greens as garnish are fun and interesting (think kale chips!) and they are our favorite appetizer. The seafood bisque is delicious and uncommon, a nice fusion of east and west (beware, has dairy).  We love the two-style fish, where they serve the lovely fish broth and then another platter with the remainder--(fish, tofu, cabbage) but that is a dish we only order when we have a large group. I always order the prawns and the egg white/scallop fried rice, which never disappoints.  That fried rice is perhaps the best I've ever had, other than the dish my mother-in-law makes.  Overall, I think this is pretty much the only game in town for good chinese food.  I find it far superior to the other local offerings and to get anywhere close to this, I usually have to head down to Cupertino. They have a great private room in the back, and I've been to a company Christmas party there--have to say, the quality of the food took a bit of a dive at that event, so I don't think they are really set up for mass gatherings.
I only came here for dimsum few times. The food is decent but it is pricey. The only reason that I came is because they served dimsim till 3pm on weekends.
Food was good - tasted fresh. Pretty expensive though - $20/person for lunch.  That's if you order off the menu.  Dim sum only would be more. Nice setting.
Great food and service. We had a party in the private room last Saturday. We had the second menu. Everything is tasty and very presentable. My guests are all happy:)
Had the Honey sea bass and it's definitely worth the price. Portion is filling and sea bass is extremely tender. Tartar sauce is extremely good and you can definitely tell it's of very high quality. Sea bass comes with a few slices of green and red bell pepper and even those were freaking amazing. Definitely coming here again
Yummy dim-sum here many choices and much fresher than when it is served on the carts.Kind of expensive. We arrived close to closing time and the service was a little pushy considering the kitchen was about to close.Overall really fresh tasting good quality worth the price but wish the service was better.
Hands down, the best Chinese food in the bay area.  This is not your Americanized Chinese joint.  The place is elegant and also the food.  Have been there many times and have not had anything that was not delicious!
Excellent excellent excellent. I've never been a fan of Chinese food, but this restaurant has changed my mind. The freshest of fresh ingredients, dishes elegantly presented. Came for a private party in the back room, and the food was spectacular, with service to match. Would love to go back.
I really like the food here. I've only been twice, but each time the food was really good. The portions are very small for the price.
For the amount of dough my family spent on putting on my sister's wedding banquet here, ~$8000 for about 110 people, we were really disappointed. I feel kind of bad about writing the following review, but, it has to be done. The family picked Taipan because it was so clean, so nicely decorated, and we wanted a Chinese restaurant that didn't look all grungy, and we had heard some good reviews. So, we went over there a few months prior to eat some of the food and figure out the dinner menu. They had maybe 6 different kinds of 10-course meals and so we tried four or five dishes from one of the lower end ones. It was one that didn't have abalone or shirk fin, it was really a "low-end" one. When the food came, we ate everything, I even ate some of the decorations, and everything was delicious. But then we delicately asked them, um, will the portions be bigger at the actual wedding banquet?  Because what we're getting here is quite small, we don't want the people to starve... And the owner laughed at us and said of course the portions will be bigger! This is just for us to sample the food, to get a taste of what the real thing will be like! Don't worry, no one will starve, there will be plenty of food! Ok, so this is probably the main reason why I'm here yelping.  Because, frankly, she was very dishonest and lied to our faces. The portions at the wedding banquet was minuscule. Teeny. Tiny. No bigger than what we tried the first time, some even smaller. The rundown of how they screwed us: - The BBQ ribs: At our table, each person got one rib. When we went to sample, we each got two ribs. - The walnut prawns: 2 shrimps per person and not everyone got a walnut. C'mon! This is just too cheap! - The sea jewel soup: The soup container came half empty! And don't you tell me it's half full! You can't tell it's half empty right away because of the puff pastry on top, but I was f'ing horrified because that was my favorite thing when we had been there earlier when we picked out the menu. - The taro bowl thing: Eh, nothing special. - Peking Duck: Bony. - Whole steamed fish: Man, I could've eaten that guppy all by myself. I was getting worried because I could tell the guests were getting antsy and hungry; we were more than half way through and everything had been appetizer-sized. Anyway, no point in running down the rest of the menu, but seriously, for the amount of dough we were shelling out, we really expected more food. I mean, you can't eat the pretty plates, and if you want your guests to have a nice time and good memories, you don't leave them starving towards the end and looking forward to the fried rice. If not for the fried rice (which was dry, bland, and mediocre and hardly any one touched), I would've gone home hungry from my own sister's wedding. Now for the alcohol part: The wedding was full of Chinese people who can't drink and a lot of kids, so we basically told the restaurant that we'd like to have 1 bottle per table and if one table happens to run out, they can undoubtedly reach over to another table and there will be some there. And if people wanted mixed drinks or sodas, they can order separately and then have that be put on our tab at the end of the night. Well, there wasn't a bottle at each table.  They had servers fill the glasses so when you ran dry, you had to track down someone to refill, and that was nearly impossible after the food service started.  In the beginning, before the food came out, it was ok, but once the food started coming, I was dying of thirst and couldn't get any more water. I had to get out my own water bottle. Also, in the beginning before the food came, I sent my brother in-law to the bar to get me a Mojito. He came back and said they couldn't make me one. I'm like, wtf, they can't make a mojito? How hard is that?? So he told me that they said they could make me a rum and coke. Uh, ok, I guess I'll have a rum and coke. Seriously, that's one incompetent bar. And several times I saw the wait staff rolling their eyes, or looking pissed off because the wedding guests and photographer are moving around between the tables and being in the way of the wait staff. Ok, I could see how they would want to have a straight shot back and forth from the kitchen to the tables, but it's a wedding party! They should really have tried at least to not look so angry and pissed at us.  Maybe they weren't getting paid enough, but what the hell, we were paying gratuity inclusive in the final bill, it's not like we're causing trouble for nothing. No one was drunk and being obnoxious, we didn't spill or break anything that they had to clean up, so the dour attitudes were not called for. Anyway, so in short: I would not go back. I would not recommend it to anyone. I have had better Chinese food, better Chinese banquets, better service, better everything, for cheaper and less aggravation elsewhere.
Excellent service and food.  Upon returning from a week long trip to Asia, I was delighted by the excellent service and delicious food.  My new go-to Chinese food in the Bay Area.  Best Peking Duck, love the pea shoots, and their unique mango desert.
Excellent excellent food! We were initially greeted and welcomed by the owners.  Once seated, the waitress promptly took our order and made several recommendations.  The owners even came to check on us to see what we had ordered and if they could suggest anything else. We ordered the basil chicken, buddha's delight, vegetarian egg rolls and riesling to accompany our meal. The food was very fresh and tasty with our palate appreciating each distinct flavor.  The riesling had a touch of lychee in it which we found refreshing.  The creme brulee was decent, not exceptional.  Overall the experience was wonderful, and I recommended the restaurant to my sister who had a similar experience!!
I don't know of too many decent cantonese places in the Palo Alto area, so I figured we'd give this one a try since at the very least it looked nice and had decent reviews. We got to the place it looked very nice and posh. However, when we tried ordering the waiter taking our order was very impatient, arrogant and rude. I tried ordering a variation of peking duck with lettuce wraps. (A very common variation at any upscale cantonese restaurant.) However, the waiter repeatedly said that he didn't understand and that they didn't do things that are not on the menu. Finally after much frustration he said he'd ask the kitchen if they could do it, all the while speaking to our party in a very demoralizing tone. We almost left right that instant, but we didn't know where else to get decent peking duck. Other than the experience with the rude waiter, the food itself was quite good. One last thing though, I would classify the food more as Americanized Hong Kong Style food than authentic.
a dim sum restaurant with a nice atmosphere. who would've thought? yes, prices are a little higher than usual ($4-8/dish), but the flavors are also lighter and less oily. of particular interest were the vegetarian dumplings. dim sum doesn't always offer a lot of variety in vegetarian options, but the pea shoots dumpling and vegi fun gow dumplings were both surprisingly flavorful and delicate. also good were the spinach & seafood dumplings and the pan fried turnip cake (again, not super greasy). but, what was one of my faves here? the chili hot sauce that they mix for you and the pretty glass pot of tea (yes, there is a charge for it).
Been there since they took over Flower Lounge.  At the beginning, when they were not really busy, we really liked eating there because they were friendlier. We went back for dinner 2 weeks ago.  Wow, looks like that they do not like Asian anymore.  Don't know why, perhaps, they know only Asian know how well they are doing. We had a strong feeling that they do not cater for Asian anymore.  They seem to like serving non- Asian more.  Pathetic.  Food there was never extraordinary, just average, edible.
this was the most exquisite chinese meal i've ever had!  it doesn't look like much outside, so when we went in, we were absolutely floored.  sufficed to say, this place definitely caters to palo alto clientele. i went with some old co-workers who have travelled all around the bay area, one of who was from china, and we've had our fill of dim sum.  from joy luck in cupertino to koi palace in daly city, we've had it all.  at the end of the meal, we had a round table discussion (auditors, can't help it), and we all agreed that it was the best dim sum we've ever had.  granted, you were probably paying an extra $2-$4 a plate, but the quality was definitely there. the downside was you had to pay $2/person for tea, BUT as two of us were SERIOUS tea drinkers, it was pretty high end stuff.  myself and one other person were serious cooks and you could even taste the difference in the soy sauce - that was very good quality too!  you could taste a real soy flavor! so all in all, we ended up paying $15 each (including tax and tip), which i think is not too bad for a sit down place in palo alto - and we were able to be pretty full when we left. word of warning:  there are no carts going through.  could be seen as good or bad.  in our case it was good because we were actually able to have nice conversation and actually hear each other. i would rather spend this much and have a really good quality dim sum lunch than have a $10 dim sum lunch and be disappointed. taipan, i'm glad i found you and i'm glad dim sum is now being served by my work!
I was really pleasantly surprised.   I haven't been here in a long time but really liked it.  I had dim sum here on a weekday and thought it was excellent.  The decor is really upscale, elegant, beautiful and spacious, the food was refined and delicious, and the service was very good as well.  We ordered the peashoot dumplings, mushroom dumplings, sticky rice in lotus leaf, panfried turnip cake in XO sauce, BBQ pork rice roll, and everything was very good.
The service is, admittedly a bit brusque, but the food is delicious and the atmosphere is nice. Probably exceedingly inauthentic, but nice nonetheless.
Good food, great decor, friendly staff... I came here with a party of 14, and they were great in accommodating us at two large tables.  Their portions could be a little bigger, and it's a little pricey, but otherwise I would certainly recommend it.
I would be a more loyal fan if they serve food faster.  I love their dim sum, which is of the similar or better quality than that of Yank Sing in SF.  However, they usually come in so late that my friends, who are not really into gastronomy as I am, can't tolerate the time waiting for the dishes to arrive.
Very nice and homey (well, not my home, but some nice wealthy person's home) ambiance. Very slow the night we went, but they made up for it with really great tasty food, and even a free mango pudding dessert in recognition of our longer than average wait. I would like to try it again, maybe the slowness is not standard? If you are looking for something a little less fancy (ie cheaper) but also really great, I'd go for Hunan Garden.
Came here for a late dinner. We were served decent size portions; price was a bit on the expensive side, and the service was so-so. We came late, close to closing time, and were practically rushed out towards the end.  Great experience but come early otherwise you'll get pressured out.
The honey smoked sea bass was great, but pricey, esp. for the amount.  I really enjoyed the place, as I like high quality food instead of quantity, but my mom didn't care for it.
This is a great little discovery. I agree with the folks that talk about the super friendly service. The space is beautiful with nice artistic details. Even so, you feel comfortable dressing up or down. We ordered the dim sum appetizer, which was  a lovely combination of shu mau, chives/shrimp dumplings, and a tasty shrimp dumping with citrus. I really likes the spicy pepper sauce that accompanied it. So much so that I put it all over my entree. We had the Mongolian beef, a solid rendition, and the flounder with garlic noodles, which was a huge, well-cooked piece of fish with yummy noodles. The portions are large, so we were stuffed. Nice addition to our Palo Alto restaurant list.
I just had a wonderful dinner with my mom at Taipan in Palo Alto!  Taipan serves inventive contemporary Chinese cuisine.  We ordered the sauteed minced vegetables in lettuce cups, crisy vegetarian goose, "Jai" Buddha delight with mushrooms and vegetables (a mix of about 10 different exotic vegetables and mushrooms served in a bowl made from taro shreds), and braised tofu and fresh mushrooms with basil.   Every dish was very flavorful and refined.  My mom has been eating Chinese food everyday for over forty years, and even she was impressed!  I look forward to trying more of the menu!
I have to give them an extra star because the restaurant is beautiful, elegant and spotless.  You don't always find a Chinese restaurant that is so exceptionally clean-- maybe that's what they're charging the high prices for?  Because it certainly can't be for the food. As impressed as I was with the looks of this place, I was thoroughly unimpressed with everything I ate.  All of it was too glazed, too sweet and over seasoned.    Not necessarily salty, but just too much flavor.  The meats and seafood were average quality and the dishes were pretty much what you would find at any chinese restaurant.  The worst part was how fast everything came out.  I don't think we waited more than 2 minutes before food started arriving.  How can that be fresh?  We had wine, appetizers, soup and entrees and were out in less than an hour.  Hard to justify the money we spent.
Had Chinese New Year lunch here and it was really yummy.  I liked all of the banquet dishes that were served (honey walnut prawns, fire d shrimp and crab claw ball, honey chilean sea bass, steak cubes, fried rice, chow fun, etc)
Do they not know this is the name of the world's most venomous snake?  The service is rather venomous, too, if you are not Asian.  I will enjoy Chinese cuisine elsewhere, thank you
This is my first time to Tai Pan and I am impressed and will return. I ordered potstickers, snap peas with mushrooms, and Hong Kong style pan fried pepper beef. All of them were nice and fresh. Those 3 items were enough to satisfy two adults. They have many seafood dishes which we will try on our next visit.
one of my favoritest Chinese restaurant. try the Buddha's Delight.
As me and a friend were on a quest for the perfect mean he mentioned a craving for dim sum.. i had remembered walking by taipan so we decided to give it a try and glad we did! The inside was very nice, we opted to sit at the bar cause neither of us felt dressed appropriately for the dining area. The staff were friendly and helpful. I especially liked that they automatically gave us suggestions when they saw us struggling with the drink and food menu instead of just letting us stumble through it. Gary got a asian beer tsing tao..they had a pretty extensive wine list, and a number of imported and domestic beers. we ordered: The twice cooked ribs had a caramelized sugar on them so were very sweet..not what i was expecting but good either way. we also got the fried crab claw...definantly would suggest it lots of crab and not oily like some fried dishes. steamed pork buns egg rolls chicken potstickers and the thousand layer cake was a good amount of food ended up feeding 3 of us. ask for plum sauce and hot sauce (siracha) on the side as well. All in all a good experience would suggest for meetings or maybe dates...not necessarily a family restaurant or casual pit stop.
This used to be our favorite dim sum place, quality delicious food.  However, the last couple visits were disappointing, the quality has really gone down recently.  I wonder if they changed the chef?  Our last visit was the worst - first the fried taro was cold inside, the sui mai was hard and not fresh, and the my favorite chicken bun was no longer tasty.  Aii, this is really disappointing.  They went from 5 stars to about 3.5 stars now, especially they are a lot more expensive than other places.  I really hope they will improve and keep the original high standard and quality.
Wow, this place is suprisingly good.  There aren't many good chinese restaurants around here,... Read more 
Went the other night for the first time with my girlfriend for her sister's wedding reception.  Both the food and service were amazing.  I really enjoyed the lamb chops, lobster, and the whole fish.  The shark fin soup, abalone, scallops with fried shrimp balls, and chicken were quite good as well.  The 'zodiac' drinks were excellent as well.
Dimsum was okay but wayyyyy too expensive.  Atmosphere was on the high-end side but service was not.
I plugged "restaurants" near "Palo Alto, CA" into yelp when I was looking for a place to eat and Taipan was the first thing that popped up.  Since I love dim sum, I decided to give it a try.  We came on a Saturday for dim sum.  The place is nicely decorated and bright.  We ordered an assortment of things, including shu mai, steamed shrimp dumpling, stir fried string beans, shrimp crepe, sponge cake, calamari, sticky rice, mango mousse.  Everything tasted fresh and was made of quality ingredients.  The taste was different than what I was used to from dim sum I've had before, but wasn't bad.  Since we ordered by writing on a piece of paper, there was not too much to comment about the service.  Things came out one at a time, and it would get crossed off our paper as it came out and when everything came out, we were left alone.  When we were finished eating, we flagged down a guy to pay for our meal.
Eh, so so. Really expensive for mediocre dim sum. Avoid the baked pork buns. Or, rather, porkless buns. It worked for what we needed. Dim sum for a group. But, I won't be returning if I can help it. The atmosphere was pleasant and a notch above other dim sum spots. But, I'm more about the food generally. And this place didn't cut it. Dumplings were too doughy. Turnip cake came with dried shrimp which I'm allergic to (and it wasn't in the description). Noodles were tasty. Maybe avoiding the dim sum is the way to go?
I am almost at a loss as to how to describe my experience at Taipan. First, our order was completely messed up, and instead of one appetizer and two entrees, we were brought two appetizers and one entree - not enough food, thus forcing us to order more. We had to ask them to bring out the rice we'd ordered, which they had forgotten. Once we'd finished and our table was cleared, we sat ignored in the corner for nearly 20 minutes, and we finally had to ask someone to bring the bill. Another 10 minutes went by (in which the first woman we'd asked for the bill walked by at least 5 times, without making any eye contact, and without bringing the bill), and we asked a second person to bring our bill. ANOTHER 10 minutes went by and our server finally came out with the check, which he quickly threw on the table despite my boyfriend holding a credit card out to him, and scuttled away. It literally took 45 minutes before we were able to pay and leave, and we felt like they were holding us hostage. Maybe our server was having an off night, but due to his abysmally poor service, he has basically ensured that I will never go to Taipan again. The only reason I'm giving any stars at all is that the older gentleman who owns the restaurant was incredibly nice, and the food was delicious. It was to bad the rest of our experience there completely ruined the meal.
Great food, convenient location, nice decor and even kids friendly. Why not 5 star?  I guess it is not cheap. But highly recommend it as all the dishes were very tasty.  Peppered beef was rather salty though.
Excellent dim sum in downtown Palo Alto. The dining room is beautiful, the staff attentive, and the atmosphere quiet. It was very easy to order and dishes came out pretty quickly. The best part: no wait for a table at 11.45! We had: -Har gow (shrimp dumplings): Small but tasty. -Sticky rice in lotus leaf: Sublime! -Spare ribs in black bean sauce: I want their recipe. -Green beans with pork: Crunchy and savory, 5 stars! -Baked BBQ pork buns: Top notch. -Steamed BBQ pork buns: A-OK. -Egg custards: Tiny, well browned, very good! It's not a cheap restaurant, we paid $24 a person but left pretty satisfied. Although you pay a premium for the decor, the excellent tea, and the service, it is well worth it. I can't wait to go back for dinner and try their seafood.
Features great authentic Chinese food in a fancy restaurant with excellent service and its a bit pricey but you get what you pay for.  I've gone there with my (Chinese) family for dinner several times and we loved it.  I like this better than the Hong Kong Flower Lounge, which was in this location previously (and is also a good Chinese restaurant) and better than the Chinese restaurants in Cupertino.  I've eaten at a lot of Chinese restaurants including extensively in Hong Kong and Beijing and  I really like Taipan.  We're lucky to have such a good Chinese restaurant in Palo Alto.
Taipan is the YankSing of Palo Alto. 'Nuff said...
we came here for my birthday.  i'd only been here one other time, and i had loved it.  this time was also awesome. i love this place because everything tastes so much fresher than other chinese places.  we started with the lettuce cups and peking duck.  awesome.  we also had the walnut prawns, seafood pan-fried noodles (my fav), sea bass, taipan beef, ...  i cant remember the rest, but everything was delicious.  i highly recommend this place.  :) the only thing about taipan is that it's pricey, but you do get superior quality for that price.
The best Chinese in this area, although it's upscale and on the spendy side, so we mainly reserve this for special occasions.  They use fresh, high-quality ingredients in their dishes, which puts them head-and-shoulders above the other more popular, authentic Chinese restaurants in the area.  The dining room is sumptuous, very elegant, far above what I would normally expect in any restaurant, so it's perfect for entertaining guests.  The last two times we were here, we ordered a banquet set menu and also ordered dim sum a la carte. Every dish was done exceptionally well: moist and crispy peking duck, pineapple fried rice, soy sauce chicken, succulent shrimp, bright green vegetables, tender flaky egg tarts, the list goes on.  We love their diversity and selection.  If you have the means, this is a must-try!
One of my very favorite restaurants.  No use of mother sauces making things taste the same.  Of the dim sum items, do try the rice noodles with XO sauce and the salt and pepper calamari.   On the dinner menu, the honey glazed sea bass is fantastic, but might not now be P.C.
The decor and service is nice. Food is solid and good.
I went here for brunch, and the food was subpar. I got Singaporean noodles, and they lacked flavor. You can get better quality dim sum at ranch 99.
The Chinese food here is elegant and refined, but some consider it overpriced at $15 - $20 an entree even if the service is friendly and prompt along with the nice decor.  If you're into fancy presentations with small portions, then this place is for you.  The braised pork ribs and steamed caged soup buns are worth a try.  I'm not a fan of fine dining for Chinese, but this place has the potential to please.
i expected that this was one of those nice black lacquered fancy chinese places where they change your plate every 10 minutes.  fortunately service was far less OCD than that, if not slightly austere. the interior was inviting. the rack of lamb was excellent as was the live steamed fish. the spicy green beans was outstanding, flavored with pork, and very spicy, not overly oily.  disappointingly, the lobster fried rice was bland, and the dumplings a bomb. I'd like to try the dim sum sometime since they had a sign posted saying they now serve it every day for lunch. i wasn't wowed about the experience, but it was fine and I'd be happy to come back to try more.
The dim sum here is actually pretty good. It isn't Koi Palace good but I would put it on par with Yank Sing. The dowside is that it is pretty pricey. Dim for lunch with the coworkers came out to $20 PP. And then you end up getting hungry an hour later so you have to spend more for lunch #2.
I returned here last week for some dim sum with a coworker. Mmmm... was it delicious! A bit on the pricey side for dim sum but it was worth it. After all, one of the dim sum choices was peking duck. That never happens! The restaurant is very upscale looking. They don't have carts for their dim sum. You order it by marking the amount you want on a sheet with all the dim sum choices. We ordered: 1) Peking Duck - Serving for two people. It was pre-wrapped with the steam bun, duck, hoisin sauce and scallions. There was additional hoisin sauce on the side to add if you wanted to add more 2) Crispy tofu stuffed with shrimp - This came with 8 pieces, crispy and very hot (so be careful!) The texture was just right and went perfectly with their soy sauce. 3) Rice noodle roll with shrimp - The usual amount of 3 rolls cut up into 6 pieces. This was probably the best I've had it, perfect flavor and texture. The sweet soy sauce was not too salty or sweet, just right. 4) Chicken feet - There were 5 claws. This was good in terms of texture, the flavor could be improved a little. Maybe more black bean sauce? It was still pretty good, though. 5) Egg custard tart for dessert - There were 3 pies, and they were delicious! Definitely more runny than the usual egg custard pie but it was still very good. They also tasted fresh out of the oven and was really hot. Overall, it was a wonderful and fancy dim sum experience. Worth it if you want high quality ingredients in an upscale environment. Also it's the only downtown option available for dim sum.
Upscale restaurant matches flavor, decor, and price.
Excellent service.  The food and sauces are fresh, and the portions are medium.  The food is not as spicey as say Mings or Chef Chu's, but you can request some of their fresh pepper sauce.  I had lettuce wraps, mabu tofu, soup, and some vegetable dishes.  I don't think this place is as authentic as some other restaurants in the area, but it is innovative, and delicious, a little expensive as well.
As much as we want to like this place... we just couldn't do it.  The owner is extremely courteous and helpful, but the food just didn't match the hype. Perhaps we ate here on an off night.  But with the prices as high as they are, I don't think we'll give it a second chance. Here's our dinner breakdown: seafood and tofu soup:  3 stars out of 5 lukewarm when it made it to the table, small portions taste was nice, savory. tiger prawns: 1 star out of 5 recommended by the waiter, this dish was cold by the time it made it out to us. prawns were actually small shrimp with overly salty teriyaki marinade... definitely not an authentic Chinese style Jai buddha's delight:  3 stars Nice presentation in a taro basket.  Bland, but nice variety of mushrooms, veggies, etc. Live steamed black bass:  4 stars The one shining moment in our dinner.  Well-prepared, served nice and hot, steamed in a light savory ginger broth. Clay pot chicken: 1 star Ordered this on the yelp review recommendations.  Chicken had bones which is the traditional way -- problem was that the cuts were very fatty... all skin and no meat.  The chicken was covered with corn starch or some sort of batter... never seen this in a clay pot before... and sort of destroys the clay pot concept.  I'm a HUGE fan of claypots and cook with them often myself... this one was a huge disappointment. Getting white rice at the table was tough.  The table next to us had asked three times before it finally arrived. The owner was so courteous, I have a hard time dinging this place, but man... the food was not worth the price.  At average prices, I'd give this place 2.5 stars.  For 90 bucks for dinner for two with no wine, I can't give it more than two stars. If you're looking for good, authentic Chinese food, this isn't your place.  If you're looking for a nicely decorated place to dine with a nice bar and friendly service... should be fine for you. I'm sorely disappointed, because based on previous Yelpers I had high hopes that a fine, high end Chinese dining establishment had found Palo Alto.  Oh well...  still waiting.
Probably the most expensive dim sum I've ever had. Decor and atmosphere are lavish and warm, which is probably the reason for the almost high end type dining. Overall, food was good, not great, and service was pretty good. I will say that the Taro buns are bomb, I would probably go back just for that alone!
Nice decor, mediocre Americanized Chinese food. For the price that you are paying, service is sorely lacking.
Hubby and I had dim sum here a couple of weeks ago and we both thought the food was excellent!  The service was great and everything inside the restaurant looked modern/clean.  They had a lot of options for you to choose from the menu.  This place was a bit $$$ but once a while it's a nice treat :)
Very well-executed upscale Chinese food.  Would only come here for a special occasion, though.  It is quite pricey.
I love Tai Pan -- fresh ingredients, well-prepared.  My daughter has eaten more here than anywhere I've ever seen.  A bit pricey, so more of an occasional outing.  But worth it.
Finally, a restaurant in NorCal to rescue the chinese restaurant's image as a dingy and dirty establishment serving up greasy, oversalted fast food! When I first visited Taipan, I was blown away by the decor, which is uniquely asian, stylish and elegant. Noticeably absent are the garish red lanterns and karaoke stage. But don't let the decor distract you from the food--it is exceptional. The menu has both classic cantonese as well as more contemporary chinese dishes. A few of the highlights from the menu include the Taipan grill lamb chops and honey smoked seabass. The flavors are extremely subtle and refined. Each dish is prepared carefully with fresh ingredients and presented beautifully. The service is always friendly and attentive but never intrusive. Taipan is a little pricier than a typical chinese restaurant, but realize that this is NOT a typical chinese restaurant. For a sumptuous dining experience, the price is a value! We visit Taipan anytime we can and intend to continue to enjoy fabulous chinese cuisine in a comfortable setting there for many years to come!
Taipan is a regular lunch place for me because it's real close by to my work.  It would have gotten 5 stars if it weren't for the price... i think it's ridiculously expensive.  I think it costs twice as much to eat dim sum here than anywhere else I've gone to in the entire state of California.  The regular menu items here are also expensive- not ridiculous when compared to other bay area chinese restaurants but portions are smaller so i am taking that into consideration.  After saying all that though- the quality of their food is really high.  you can really taste the difference.  it's definitely some of the BEST dimsum i've had in the area.  Also, their honey smoked sea bass, fukien fried rice, wonton soup and pea sprouts is some of the best i've had.  not too much oil.  and really fresh ingredients.  if it doesn't leave you broke, i'd suggest coming here to give it a try.
We've been going since they opened and were there just last Saturday night.  Excellent food and we all commented again on what a wonderfully decorated restaurant contributing to a great ambiance.  We've never been disappointed and have never heard anything but raves from our friends.
Pretty good chinese food (so hard to find in the PA area).  The fish dishes are the main reason to go.
The food was good, but not the best I've had. I guess for the price I expected better.
Taipan is one of the best Chinese Restaurants around.  Their food is authentic, but served in a modern, elegant restaurant.  The service is nothing short of exceptional.  My friends and I had a great time. Happy Birthday Robert!
Food is just 3 stars. It's good but it's expensive. They get +1 more * for the service and ambiance. It's definitely a nice place. The twice cooked ribs are good as is the chow fun. The walnut prawns are pretty good also. The Peking Duck was not good however and I would avoid it.
My family and I have dined at Taipan many times since it first opened.  The food has consistently been excellent.  Now that the restaurant serves a Sunday dim sum, I think it's on par with the best dim sum I have had anywhere.  The steamed dumplings are particularly good.  The seafood and Chinese greens, such as pea shoots, bok choy and Chinese broccoli, are always fresh.  The steamed tofu with mixed seafood is delicious.  We stay away from the fried dishes but again the calamari and other lightly fried items are exquisite.  Lastly, Ms. Lee always makes one feel comfortable and at home in the restaurant.  The combination of great food and gracious service make this place an A+.
The best and most expensive Dim Sum I have ever had. 'Nuff said.
If you can accept the higher prices and modest-sized servings, then this place is worthy.  Decor is nice and upscale - rare for a Chinese food restaurant. Every dish we ordered was good - also rare for a Chinese restaurant.  Lobster noodles were excellent.  Outstanding were honey ribs, peking duck, and jasmine basil chicken (recommended by the waitress).  Rounding out the meal were "very good" renditions of corn soup, soy-sauteed prawns and beef with asparagus.  Service was very good too.  Another rarity in Chinese restaurants.  Try it.  You'll like it.
Not your typical greasy, MSG latent, loud dim sum restaurant. Although a bit pricier than most, Taipan offers delicious al la carte dim sum and Chinese dishes that are sure to please your lunch time cravings.  Not only does the food have wonderful flavors but the hot chili sauce and jalapeno soy sauce on each table provides a good kick of spice. A must try is the salt & pepper tofu...with a consistency unlike anything else - crunchy & silky!
Exquisite. The mango pudding is to die for.
Great place for both lunch and dinner. Nice service, nice atmosphere and tasty food.
We tried Taipan's dim sum this weekend.  The dim sum is excellent but pricy!  Unlike other dim sum places, you order from a menu so you can't see the dim sum before you order it.   This was not a problem since we are familiar with dim sum. Everything we ordered was delicious.  Prices are higher than any other dim sum restaurant.  Most items are $4 to $7 each.  But the quality of the dim sum is the best I've had in the bay area.  If you eat a much as we do, dim sum will cost about $25-$35 a person.
I had dinner at Taipan.  We had the dim sum sampler, fujian fried rice, seafood bird nest and mango... Read more 
Wow, this has to be the most upscale Chinese restaurant I have ever been to. Our group ordered a set meal and every dish was amazing! I have no idea what the dishes were called but the highlights included a cream based seafood soup with a pastry top, deep fried balls of shrimp with chestnuts pieces mixed inside, and the best mango pudding I have ever had served in a champagne flute. Delicate flavors, great presentation, and service. Although I don't have the budget to eat here too often this place is definitely worth a try for a special occasion.
Birthday brunch for a good girlfriend.  The food is delicious and the service excellent.  My only disappointment was that there were no carts of dim sum rolling by to tempt me.  There is something to be said about that loss of ambiance.
Good food, great service, and decent price.  Definitely going back
really nice ding out place, recommend their sea bass!!!
We gave Tai Pan a try last night and were highly impressed.  This is not your typical white boy Chinese food.  Our service was exceptional, and the waiter's recommendations gave us a chance to sample some of their more unique dishes. The venison dish was excellent, not at all gamey, but truly flavorful.  The honey smoked melts in your mouth, anyone who enjoys butterfish will love it.  The egg white fried rice is also worth a try. The restaurant is refreshingly quite, perhaps a bit too quiet, but I suspect that may change soon as more people discover it.
Great dim sum on a sunday at noon and no line. I can't understand why this place isn't packed every day with a line out the door on Sunday (price? not cheap but not over the top.)  While I'd give it 4-stars if you count the entire bay area, it gets 5-stars for being the best between Cupertino and Millbrae. Fresh ingredients, great service, up scale decor.  Wonderful Peking Duck, Chicken in Lettuce cups, shrimp dumplings, BBQ pork buns, etc. Only down-side is I love dim-sum that gets delivered on carts so you can see what you're getting. Here you order from a menu. Probably not enough volume to keep them fresh.  Still worth it.
Food is overpriced, and the portions were small.  I probably wouldn't come here again because of the price in proportion to the amount of food you get.  The food was good and service was good.
Oh my Dim Sum!!! I thought my family knew every good Chinese restaurant in the area until I ate here.  I've passed this restaurant several times, but was in the mood for some dim sum and thought "What the heck!"  The decor was a lot more upscale than I had expected.  I was probably a bit under dressed in my flip flops, but nonetheless received great service. The food was amazing, but so was the price.  A little steep for dim sum, but the food was extremely tasty.  This was some of the best dim sum that I ever had. We ordered the tofu with the minced shrimp, har gow, egg custard, shark fin dumpling soup and some salt and pepper squid and peeking duck in bun. I kind of missed the carts, but the food was fresh so you can't beat that. Top Notch if you ask me.
This is probably one of the most authentic Chinese ( Cantonese cuisine) restaurants in South bay!  The best dim sum I ever had in the bay area, it's a bit on the pricy side but you get what you paid for. We had our rehearsal dinner here about a month ago, our guests not only enjoyed the ten course meal also loved the ambience, the decors look very elegant and classy. Definitely not your American chinese restaurant cheesy look.  One of the best egg-white fry rice in town,  even my parents who don't like to eat out because they make the best Chinese food home said that they loved the food there!   My personal favorite was their Seafood chowder, Honey roasted Sea bass ( melts in your mouth), and crab claws!!!    They also have a good wine list with reasonable price compare to other high-end chinese restaurant.
Very good!
the food is very good. a full 4.5 stars for food. the decor is beautiful. almost 5 stars. the portions were tiny - the prices were very high - they charge for tea - very slow and unresponsive service. minus 8 stars. 3 people and the bill was $80. after that i was still hungry and went to IN AND OUT for a burger. after a regular cheeseburger (no fries) i felt as if i had eaten a nice full meal. personally i prefer dim-sum in oakland or san francisco at one third the price where 3 people are stuffed for $40. keep the cloth table cloths and give me the steam carts. i'm sure that there must be many other eateries in palo alto where the students like to go for good eats for a good price.
The food and the service are outstanding! The dishes are brought one by one, so you can savor its true flavor instead of getting cold on the table. All dishes are very flavorful - we had dim sums and a few main dishes. Everything was very very tasty - shrimp, beef, tofu, chicken, rice - amazing. The service was outstanding - very fast and helpful. It is on the pricey side - but well worth it.
Though not authentic, the food here is good and reminds me of the more lavish aesthetic chinese cuisine which has grown popular in china lately. I went there with another dining companion and ended up enjoying my meal despite a couple mishaps. The two of us ordered... -rice which was somewhat bland (3/5), and unattended to since it arrived as we were paying our bill :( -beef chow mein (3.5/5) which was rather tasty, but not much different from what you would usually expect -dumplins in hot sauce appetizer (4/5). I am a big fan of spicy wonton and was not disappointed with these -sea bass and eggplant in clay plot (4/5). The dish was tasty though it sadly did not come in a claypot. -crispy duck plate (4/5) [though not as good as beijing duck it was very tasty and crispy for a simple bbqed duck half] All in all the food was tasty, the ambiance good (4/5) and the prices were reasonable (not taking into account the lobster, shark fin, abalone, and bird's nest dishes). If you do not mind "westernized" chinese food, and are willing to spend $25 per person, I would recommend this place if you are in need of an oriental meal.
I came here for dimsum with my parents once.  Until that day, I didn't know a good Chinese restaurant existed in downtown Palo Alto.  The decor is fancy...has what looks to be elegant pieces of traditional artwork.  I guess that's what the high prices pay for.  That and the Waverley lease. We had your standard dimsum fare, shaolong bao, turnip cake, pork spareribs, various small dumplings, beef wrapped in rice noodle, etc.  I forget what else we ordered, but whatever we ordered was quite good.  The beef wrapped in rice noodle was something new...at most dimsum places the rice noodle only comes with shrimp.  The taste was just right, very light, very little excess oil.  It comes out as you order, as opposed to being wheeled around for who knows how long.  The normal menu may not be authentic, but I think the dimsum was.  Every patron in the restaurant at the time was speaking either Mandarin or Cantonese. Note to self...only eat here when someone else foots the tab.
Our family has had dinner at Tai Pan several times over the past few years. We love this place! The food at Tai Pan is absolutely delicious and is without a doubt the best Chinese food we have had in the Bay Area; in fact we rarely go to any other Chinese restaurants anymore. We have been at countless different Chinese restaurants over the past 25 years and this one is by far the best! The service at Tai Pan has always been top notch - very polite, attentive and professional. The ambience is both elegant and homey.  The decor is both refined and welcoming. We have tried several different dishes at Tai Pan and without a doubt each dish has been excellent and the best we have ever had. Our favorite dishes are the Walnut Prawns, Moo Shu Chicken, Bok Choy and Snap Peas, and Chicken-Fried Rice. Last night we tried a new dish, Lamb with Scallion in XO sauce, which was sensational. We always get the pot stickers as an appetizer. On our very first visit to Tai Pan a couple years ago we had the pleasure of meeting the owners. Tai Pan seems to be a family-run restaurant, and the owners are extremely nice. We can't say enough good things about Tai Pan and highly recommend it to families, groups or couples who want a top notch culinary experience at a reasonable price.
Very nice and classy Chinese food restaurant.  Their menu items are not of what you would find in your typical hole-in-the-wall Chinese food restaurant.  I was fortunate to go with a friend who has been there before and knows what to order.  I was impressed and cannot believe how Koi Palace got a better review for food than this place in Zagat.
We wanted to order takeout on a Friday evening. A bit unusual for a Chinese restaurant in that their phone was not answered on 6 rings. Second attempt, same thing except that it went to voice mail asking a caller to leave a time/day for which they'd like a reservation. It was time to drive there and order in person. No one in the lobby/bar to greet or take order. Finally a waitress came by to enter her order and took mine as well. Food: 4.5 stars Service: 2 stars. Prices: Higher than other Chinese restaurants in the area. Portions: Smaller than other Chinese restaurants in the area. No takeout menu available. Website menu: Terrible. Multiple PDF files. Prices on the web menu are lower than what you'd be charged. Verdict: Next time, we'd go there to eat.
The food and service get a 5, the prices are a bit high for a dim sum place. But if the idea of a real dim sum place overwhelms you, think of taipan as your training wheels. But just like training wheels it comes with a price. 4 stars for value for the money.
We came here last night for dinner. It was pre ordered by our host. This is a very nice Chinese restaurant, not your usually pictured florescent lighting, sticky menu, chop suey joint. See pics posted. The menu of food we had here was not your typical, or boring, Americanized Chinese food. No sweet and sour anything or that general dude and his chicken. We started with a shrimp papaya salad, followed by sauteed squab. Very yummy. The soup was shark's fin and crab. A bit on the salty side. Then there was abalone and black muchrooms, a lobster dish and whole steamed fish. I had to write down what we had since I might never remember all these dishes. The rice dish had sauted scallops in it. There were 10 of us at the table and its all served family style. I was very stuffed. This is the Bay Area, so the server didn't ask me if I needed a fork....in Reno, everybody gets a fork! I don't know how much this dinner costs, but I heard it was something like $50 a person......super nice dinner.....no chop suey here. Definitly a good choice for a special occasion.
Honestly, the food is good, but I come from a looongg background of dim sum eaters, and so I've had better. The main problem is, I've never paid so much for dim sum in my liiiife!! So I'm probably not going back anytime soon. Yes, I understand with these places you are mostly paying for the ambiance, but I just can't fathom WHY someone pays twice as much for the exact same food just to be surrounded by expensive decor for an hour while ya eat.  The service was nothing stellar, the waiters pretty much just bring you your food and leave you alone. I've had dim sum in China several times, where the food is 100 times better and about 1/4 the cost. Of course, if you can afford going to China for lunch, I definitely recommend it...but if you can't, then go to a place where dim sum is still $1.99 a plate! If you compare the dishes side by side, its almost the same! Unfortunately, I think there's just not a lot of good, cheap dim sum joints around Palo Alto. But the search continues...
Mediocre food. Decent service. May not come back again since I do not even remember what I ate here a few weeks back.
I'm a big fan of this restaurant.  The interior is clean and elegant and the food was to die for.  My sister and I ordered a bunch of the appetizers (lettuce cups, salt & pepper sea bass, ribs, peking duck) and their garlic lobster . For dessert, we had their mango pudding which tasted fresh and homemade.  The service was excellent!  We were greeted by the restaurant owners whom welcomed us warmly and once seated, the servers were friendly and attentive.  I'd definitely come back!!
not cheap~taste all right
This is not a bad dimsum place, and I would say the dinner is quite good, only if they charge more reasonable prices for the caliber of food they offer.  If you have to pick between Ming's and Taipan, I would vote for the latter, but they are better choices around.  Oh, the service, just ignore their attitude and order what you like.  They tend to subtly snarl if you order some of the non-exotic dishes, but hey, it is the patron's choice and money, not theirs.
i ate here and it was aite
one of the best hong kong style cuisines in this area. i went there a year ago, accompanied by the owner's friend. the atmosphere, the service, the food and its presentation. they were all excellent. we ordered live lobster sashimi and empress seafood soup for starters. can't remember what we had for the main entrees, but i do recall it was a wonderfull dining experience so i wanted to come back to try some other dishes. any family friends discount?
Tonight, for my birthday dinner, my boyfriend and I went to eat at Tai Pan for the first time. I have never been so impressed with a restaurant experience than I was at Tai Pan. The food was extremely fresh and delicious. We ordered the Sea Bass, Chinese Broccoli w/ Oyster Sauce, Pan Fried Noodles w/ Black Pepper Beef, and two desserts -- the Sesame Mochi and the Fried Banana w/ Ice Cream. We loved every single dish and thought it was the perfect balance between being flavorful but not being salty, oily, or full of MSG (which is so common in other Chinese restaurants). But on top of the delicious food, the service blew us both away. Being Chinese, I've been to Chinese restaurants all my life and am accustomed to receiving bad service in good Chinese restaurants. But at Tai Pan -- everyone from the waiters to the owners were so nice and helpful. As soon as we walked into the restaurant, the hostess (who we think is also one of the co-owners) had a big smile on her face as she greeted us. Our waiters were nice as well -- very courteous. But the owners really impressed us. Not only did we see the male owner walking to each table and chatting animatedly w/ his customers, but you could tell that he genuinely loved speaking w/ his customers. He came over to our table about 5 times or so, each time joking, friendly and gracious. I told him several times how much I loved his restaurant, and he was very humble. I told him that we'll definitely be back... the food was amazing, but the combination of the food and the personalized service is so rare these days! P.S. Loved the elegant decor as well as the quiet, calm atmosphere here -- so rare at Chinese restaurants!
Went for lunch on Monday and had Hot and Sour Soup, Jade Basil Chicken/steamed rice. Treated very well, delicious food, total was a bit high for lunch, but the quality of the food met the pricetag and service.
I Love, Love, this place!  It's so pretty inside, the chairs and tables are nicely spaced apart and relaxed.  The staff is very courteous and are careful to make sure dishes are timed correctly.  I originally came to check it out for our wedding reception, because their banquet menu was exactly what I was looking for.  We got the five course meal and it was awesome.  The first course was minced chicken in a lettuce cup and a crab claw.  The crab claw was fried just right so it was juicy in the inside and crispy and delicate on the outside.  The seafood jewels bisque was awesome and not something I'd usually eat, but I ate it all up.  The third dish was lobster, and I don't usually like lobster but the sauce was yummy.  I think this place is more like Tommy Toy's.  It's french style fusion asian food, so if you don't like fusion, then you won't like it.  It's a little small for my 150 guests, so I probably won't have my reception there, but if I could, I definitely would!
We eat there pretty much every weekend, the best dim sum I ever had, upscale, a little price but completely worthy, the freshness and quality of the food comes through. They are also very nice with children.  My favorite restaurant in Palo Alto.
This is a wonderful place to dine on upscale Chinese food. The owner and staff are cordial and exceptionally helpfu. From potstickers to more exotic crab dishes, these folks excel. A bonus is the very lovely interior with tables separated nicely for added comfort.
I first tried dim sum here several months ago.  I went on a Sunday and sat all by my lonesome.  But it was tasty!  I loved the peking duck and shanghai dumplings in particular (two of my favorite dishes and coincidentally two of my "test" dishes at new dim sum places).  I was very impressed.  Later on, I tried dishes off of the main menu - they were good, but not as good as the dim sum.  So I decided to splurge one night and I got a half peking duck to go.  They included extra hoisin without me asking.  When I got home, my mouth was ecstatic - it was some of the best peking duck EVER.  Unfortunately, on repeat orderings throughout the following weeks, the duck was drier, smaller, and I was given a little runaround when asking for extra hoisin - they eventually gave me an extra mini-cup of it.  I will still go back in hopes that my future peking ducks from there are as good as that first one, but I have yet to perfectly repeat it.
Fantastic. So much better than any of the other Chinese restaurants in the area, even Mandarin Gourmet. The food is super fresh, everything isn't drowning in sugar-laden sause, nothing is over-cooked, the fried stuff is even light(-ish), and the service is friendly. Spendy, but very good. It's fast becoming a stand-by for Nathalie and I.
Went to Taipan for takeout and was very happy with my choice. The standards I usually get for takeout were above par: beef and asparagus and shrimp dumplings. Wow. Great. The sticky fried rice was awesome. Highly recommend. As far as eating in at Taipan, it looked a little stuffy and not my taste, but the takeout was fantastic. Will definitely go to Taipan again when I'm back in Palo Alto.
This is my favorite Chinese restaurant.  It is upscale, but still reasonably priced.  Nice decor, clean, like your eating in someone's living room.  The food is awesome.  From the honey ribs that are so tender they fall off the bone, to the seabass that melts in your mouth, to the crisp peking duck, to the simple favorful dishes like the jade basil chicken.  The owners Jeannie and Chris are so friendly and really take care of their customers.
food quality = 4 decor = 5 service = 2 value = 2 i had a family dinner at taipan last night to celebrate mom's birthday and the service was disappointing but food were decent.  our party of ten arrived at 6pm and we couldn't leave until after 8:30pm because each item we ordered took so long.  in american time, that's an average dinner outing.  in hong kong time, that's a life time you wasted on one dinner outing. speaking as a hong kong native, their food were decent however not authentic.  that's not to say i didn't appreciate the twist they put in their creations.  the decor is very current and caters to the western crowd.  the same goes for their food portions and presentation.  although there were other chinese families dinning at the restaurant, it was clearly marketed to the non-chinese audience particularly when it came to service. if you were a friend of mine, i would recommend trying this place but i wouldn't add this on my favorites list. happy dinning!
I went to this place when I first arrived in Palo Alto and was exploring the places around. This place is basically serving okay chinese food with almost doubling the price (I think the price just got me mad at that time. I have had much better food at this price). I guess the only up side is that they have better service compared to other chinese retaurant (cuz nobody was there!). Maybe the restaurant was decorated, but I don't really care as long as it's a clean place. I don't think I will ever come again if I have a choice. It just does not worth it. Or if you don't really care about price but a quite and comfortable place AND you restrict to Palo Alto... maybe 3 star then?
A wonderful experience!  We had a party of six for lunch and needed to make our reservation later as some members were running late.  The hostess was very gracious and accommodating.  The service was spot on and the dim sum was delicious!
Always consistent.  Certainly the best game in town in Palo Alto.  I was really happy with the addition of Dim Sum several months ago.  This makes for a great Saturday/Sunday without having to go to Cupertino or Milpitas.
The restaurant is beautiful... Food is just awesome! I love the crab and abalone!! Great people great times!
Delicious. Love the vegetarian dim sum and other vegetarian options. Great service. The diet coke was flat and the dining room was stuffy so only 4 stars.
Good place, nice dim sum
The decor is interesting - like an Asian history museum.  This is probably the best part of it.  The food was ok, but not what I would consider authentic Chinese.  There was a soup we ordered which tasted like it might have come out of a can - cream of mushroom mixed with some other ingredients, inside of a croissant-like shell.  Definitely not Chinese, and really not what I would have expected from a restaurant with such otherwise nice presentation as this one.  Service was good.
It's expensive, but you get what you pay for which is really fresh tasty food.  Only tried the lunch time Dim Sum, but they clearly are making the treats themselves by hand or are sourcing from a pretty high end unique supplier because the quality is far better then what you get from other near by Chinese Dim Sum.
We hosted our wedding here last weekend. The food was excellent, and the service was even better. The owner was very down to earth and accommodating to our needs. My friends had a blast at the bar. Highly recommended if you are looking for a cozy and nicely decorated place all to yourself.
We are a Chinese family that has been to just about every dimsum place in the Bay Area.  This is not your ordinary dim sum restaurant.  Good dimsum restaurants are overflowing with Chinese families, noisy with chatter and with long lines on weekends.  Taipan is for those who are uncomfortable in those settings and are willing to pay more for a quiet and upscale restaurant.  I expected great service to go along with the high prices and was disappointed.  You basically get Chinese service at American restaurant prices.  The place is freezing cold and service was slow for the number of people working there and the number of empty tables.  The waitress reluctantly gave us a change of plates, no one came by to refill our teapot, and a couple of dishes came so late we had forgotten we had ordered them.  Dim sum was ok - some items like the steamed dumpling items were ok but a bit bland, the baked puffs were all too gooey - the pastry a bit undercooked, eggrolls  greasy.  HK fried noodles were good but not plentiful.  All in all, not as good as places like Dynasty, Yank Sing, Joy Luck etc.  The lunch menu, if you don't have dim sum is pretty pricey with entrees between $10 - 20.  I don't think we will be going back.
the restaurant is very nicely setup for treating business partners and clients to an upscale lunch or dinner.  i feel comfortable bringing executive level partners to this restaurant because it is very clean and service is great.  the ambience is  conducive to having business discussions.  i would not bring little kids for casual family dinners though.
You know food is good when you can eat it stone cold and it's still tasty.   I've just finished a doggie bag of  Tai Pan's Garlic Beef with Asparagus   It was excellent when hot as well, the beef tender  and the asparagus crisp.    My husband's shrimp with lobster sauce was a surprise, however, as they used pork in the  sauce.  I enjoyed the sauce but then I'm not the pescetarian.    My husband doesn't eat meat, only seafood,  and he had to pick around the pork bits.  Our shrimp with mango was interesting and the hot and sour vegetarian soup was good.    Other reviewers have complained about the priciness of the chow mein  or friend rice dishes.  Don't go here for cheap dishes  Also, do not go here for service, it was adequate but lackluster.  The waiter did not ask if we wanted dessert.    We're glad we tried Tai Pan but would probably not go back as their food, while sometimes aspiring, did not exceed other Chinese restaurants in Palo Alto, such as Mandarin Gourmet
Very good Chinese food in a very elegant setting.  Good service, too!  How often do you find all of these things in one Chinese restaurant?  The food was not slathered in sauce like in a lot of other places.  I'm a great fan of flavorful food, so I was glad to see a Chinese restaurant that could achieve flavorful food without dumping tons of sauce on every dish.  The prices are more expensive than at other good restaurants, but you are paying for the elegance + service, of which typical Chinese restaurants are missing one or the other.  I would probably use this place if you want a more classy dining experience with Chinese food and are willing to pay a little more for it.  I think this place is way more classy than the Dynasty restaurants in Cupertino and San Jose, and the various dishes are on par or better, with more contemporary dishes.  For example, the desserts were yummy, but they did not have typical Chinese desserts.  Mango pudding was about the only Chinese dessert, but it was served in a champagne glass and was not your "mango-pudding-from-a-box" mix that you can get from most Chinese restaurants.  It seemed like it was made by a skillful chef.  But other desserts were quite western, like creme brulee and chocolate mousse.  The rest of the menu featured very typical Hong Kong dishes. and we enjoyed all our dishes. The portions are a tad smaller than most other restaurants, but I tend ot think most portions at Chinese restaurants are way too big anyway.  Those huge plates accommodate American portion sizes (and waists).  If you want a cheaper price, I would stick to whatever Chinese restaurant you already like.  If you want a different experience, try this place.
